Florida, session 2026, SB1156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 348 349 Section 1.âChapter 396, Florida Statutes, consisting of ss. 350 396.201-396.225, Florida Statutes, is created and entitled 351 âAmbulatory Surgical Centers.â 352 Section 2.âSection 396.201, Florida Statutes, is created to 353 read: 354 396.201âLegislative intent.âIt is the intent of the 355 Legislature to provide for the protection of public health and 356 safety in the establishment, construction, maintenance, and 357 operation of ambulatory surgical centers by providing for 358 licensure of the same and for the development, establishment, 359 and enforcement of minimum standards with respect thereto. 360 Section 3.âSection 396.202, Florida Statutes, is created to 361 read: 362 396.202âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 363 (1)ââAccrediting organizationâ means a national accrediting 364 organization approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 365 Services whose standards incorporate comparable licensure 366 regulations required by this state. 367 (2)ââAgencyâ means the Agency for Health Care 368 Administration. 369 (3)ââAmbulatory surgical centerâ means a facility, the 370 primary purpose of which is to provide elective surgical care, 371 in which the patient is admitted to and discharged from such 372 facility within 24 hours, and which is not part of a hospital. 373 The term does not include a facility existing for the primary 374 purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy, an office 375 maintained by a physician for the practice of medicine, or an 376 office maintained for the practice of dentistry, except that 377 that any such facility or office that is certified or seeks 378 certification as a Medicare ambulatory surgical center must be 379 licensed as an ambulatory surgical center under this chapter. 380 (4)ââBiomedical wasteâ has the same meaning as provided in 381 s. 381.0098(2). 382 (5)ââClinical privilegesâ means the privileges granted to a 383 physician or other licensed health care practitioner to render 384 patient care services in an ambulatory surgical center, but does 385 not include the privilege of admitting patients. 386 (6)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 387 (7)ââDirectorâ means any member of the official board of 388 directors as reported in the licensed facility ownerâs annual 389 corporate report to the Department of State or, if no such 390 report is made, any member of the operating board of directors. 391 The term does not include members of separate, restricted boards 392 who serve only in an advisory capacity to the operating board. 393 (8)ââEmergency medical conditionâ means: 394 (a)âA medical condition manifesting itself by acute 395 symptoms of sufficient severity, which may include severe pain, 396 such that the absence of immediate medical attention could 397 reasonably be expected to result in any of the following: 398 1.âSerious jeopardy to patient health, including for a 399 pregnant woman or fetus. 400 2.âSerious impairment to bodily functions. 401 3.âSerious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part. 402 (b)âWith respect to a pregnant woman: 403 1.âThat there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to 404 a hospital before delivery; 405 2.âThat a transfer may pose a threat to the health and 406 safety of the patient or fetus; or 407 3.âThat there is evidence of the onset and persistence of 408 uterine contractions or a rupture of the membranes. 409 (9)ââGovernmental unitâ means the state or any county, 410 municipality, or other political subdivision, or any department, 411 division, board, or other agency of any of the foregoing. 412 (10)ââHospitalâ has the same meaning as in s. 395.002. 413 (11)ââLicensed facilityâ means an ambulatory surgical 414 center licensed under this chapter. 415 (12)ââLifesafetyâ means the control and prevention of fire 416 and other life-threatening conditions on a premises for the 417 purpose of preserving human life. 418 (13)ââMedical staffâ means physicians licensed under 419 chapter 458 or chapter 459 with privileges in a licensed 420 facility, as well as other licensed health care practitioners 421 with clinical privileges as approved by a licensed facilityâs 422 governing board. 423 (14)ââPersonâ means any individual, partnership, 424 corporation, association, or governmental unit. 425 (15)ââPremisesâ means those buildings, beds, and equipment 426 located at the address of the licensed facility, and all other 427 buildings, beds, and equipment for the provision of ambulatory 428 surgical care located in such reasonable proximity to the 429 address of the licensed facility as to appear to the public to 430 be under the dominion and control of the licensee. 431 (16)ââValidation inspectionâ means an inspection of the 432 premises of a licensed facility by the agency to assess whether 433 a review by an accrediting organization has adequately evaluated 434 the licensed facility according to minimum state standards. 435 Section 4.âSection 396.203, Florida Statutes, is created to 436 read: 437 396.203âLicensure; denial, suspension, and revocation.â 438 (1)(a)âThe requirements of part II of chapter 408 apply to 439 the provision of services that require licensure pursuant to ss. 440 396.201-396.225 and part II of chapter 408 and to entities 441 licensed by or applying for such licensure from the Agency for 442 Health Care Administration pursuant to ss. 396.201-396.225. A 443 license issued by the agency is required in order to operate an 444 ambulatory surgical center in this state. 445 (b)1.âIt is unlawful for a person to use or advertise to 446 the public, in any way or by any medium whatsoever, any facility 447 as an âambulatory surgical centerâ unless such facility has 448 first secured a license under this chapter. 449 2.âThis chapter does not apply to commercial business 450 establishments using the word âambulatory surgical centerâ as a 451 part of a trade name if no treatment of human beings is 452 performed on the premises of such establishments. 453 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 408.807, after a 454 change of ownership has been approved by the agency, the 455 transferee is liable for any liability due to the state, 456 regardless of when identified, resulting from changes to 457 allowable costs affecting provider reimbursement for Medicaid 458 participation and related administrative fines. 459 (3)âAn ambulatory surgical center must comply with ss. 460 627.64194 and 641.513 as a condition of licensure. 461 (4)âIn addition to the requirements of part II of chapter 462 408, whenever the agency finds that there has been a substantial 463 failure to comply with the requirements established under this 464 chapter or in rules, the agency is authorized to deny, modify, 465 suspend, or revoke a license. 466 Section 5.âSection 396.204, Florida Statutes, is created to 467 read: 468 396.204âApplication for license; fees.âIn accordance with 469 s. 408.805, an applicant or a licensee shall pay a fee for each 470 license application submitted under this chapter, part II of 471 chapter 408, and applicable rules. The amount of the fee is 472 established by rule. The license fee required of a facility 473 licensed under this chapter is established by rule, except that 474 the minimum license fee is $1,500. 475 Section 6.âSection 396.205, Florida Statutes, is created to 476 read: 477 396.205âMinimum standards for clinical laboratory test 478 results and diagnostic X-ray results; prerequisite for issuance 479 or renewal of license.â 480 (1)âAs a requirement for issuance or renewal of its 481 license, each licensed facility shall require that all clinical 482 laboratory tests performed by or for the licensed facility be 483 performed by a clinical laboratory appropriately certified by 484 the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the federal 485 Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and the federal rules 486 adopted thereunder. 487 (2)âEach licensed facility, as a requirement for issuance 488 or renewal of its license, shall establish minimum standards for 489 acceptance of results of diagnostic X rays performed by or for 490 the licensed facility. Such standards must require licensure or 491 registration of the source of ionizing radiation under chapter 492 404. 493 (3)âThe results of clinical laboratory tests and diagnostic 494 X rays performed before admission which meet the minimum 495 standards required by law must be accepted in lieu of routine 496 examinations required upon admission and in lieu of clinical 497 laboratory tests and diagnostic X rays which may be ordered by a 498 physician for patients of the licensed facility. 499 Section 7.âSection 396.206, Florida Statutes, is created to 500 read: 501 396.206âLicensure inspection.â 502 (1)âIn addition to the requirement of s. 408.811, the 503 agency shall make or cause to be made such inspections and 504 investigations as it deems necessary, including, but not limited 505 to: 506 (a)âInspections directed by the Centers for Medicare and 507 Medicaid Services. 508 (b)âValidation inspections. 509 (c)âLifesafety inspections. 510 (d)âLicensure complaint investigations, including full 511 licensure investigations with a review of all licensure 512 standards as outlined in the administrative rules. Complaints 513 received by the agency from individuals, organizations, or other 514 sources are subject to review and investigation by the agency. 515 (2)âThe agency shall accept, in lieu of its own periodic 516 inspections for licensure, the survey or inspection of an 517 accrediting organization, provided that the accreditation of the 518 licensed facility is not provisional and provided that the 519 licensed facility authorizes release of, and the agency receives 520 the report of, the accrediting organization. The agency shall 521 develop and adopt by rule criteria for accepting survey reports 522 of accrediting organizations in lieu of conducting a state 523 licensure inspection. 524 (3)âIn accordance with s. 408.805, an applicant or a 525 licensee must pay a fee for each license application submitted 526 under this chapter, part II of chapter 408, and applicable 527 rules. Each facility licensed under this chapter must pay to the 528 agency, at the time of inspection, the following fees: 529 (a)âInspection for licensure.âA fee of at least $400 per 530 facility. 531 (b)âInspection for lifesafety only.âA fee of at least $40 532 per facility. 533 (4)âThe agency shall coordinate all periodic inspections 534 for licensure made by the agency to ensure that the cost to the 535 facility of such inspections and the disruption of services by 536 such inspections are minimized. 537 Section 8.âSection 396.207, Florida Statutes, is created to 538 read: 539 396.207âInspection reports.â 540 (1)âEach licensed facility shall maintain as public 541 information, available upon request, records of all inspection 542 reports pertaining to that facility. Copies of such reports must 543 be retained in its records for at least 5 years after the date 544 the reports are filed and issued. 545 (2)âAny record, report, or document that is confidential 546 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) may not be distributed or made 547 available for purposes of compliance with this section unless or 548 until such confidential status expires. 549 (3)âA licensed facility shall, upon the request of any 550 person who has completed a written application with intent to be 551 admitted to such facility, any person who is a patient of such 552 facility, or any relative, spouse, guardian, or surrogate of any 553 such person, furnish to the requester a copy of the last 554 inspection report filed with or issued by the agency pertaining 555 to the licensed facility, as provided in subsection (1), 556 provided that the person requesting such report agrees to pay a 557 reasonable charge to cover copying costs, not to exceed $1 per 558 page. 559 Section 9.âSection 396.208, Florida Statutes, is created to 560 read: 561 396.208âConstruction inspections; plan submission and 562 approval; fees.â 563 (1)(a)âThe design, construction, erection, alteration, 564 modification, repair, and demolition of all licensed health care 565 facilities are governed by the Florida Building Code and the 566 Florida Fire Prevention Code under ss. 553.73 and 633.202. 567 (b)âIn addition to the requirements of ss. 553.79 and 568 553.80, the agency shall review facility plans and survey the 569 construction of any facility licensed under this chapter. All 570 licensed facilities shall submit plans and specifications to the 571 agency for review under this section. The agency shall make, or 572 cause to be made, such construction inspections and 573 investigations as it deems necessary. The agency may prescribe 574 by rule that any licensee or applicant desiring to make 575 specified types of alterations or additions to its facilities or 576 to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such 577 alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and 578 specifications therefor to the agency for preliminary inspection 579 and approval or recommendation with respect to compliance with 580 applicable provisions of the Florida Building Code or agency 581 rules and standards. 582 (c)âThe agency shall approve or disapprove the plans and 583 specifications within 60 days after receipt of the fee for 584 review of plans as required in subsection (2). The agency may be 585 granted one 15-day extension for the review period if the 586 director of the agency approves the extension. If the agency 587 fails to act within the specified timeframe, it is deemed to 588 have approved the plans and specifications. When the agency 589 disapproves plans and specifications, it must set forth in 590 writing the reasons for its disapproval. Conferences and 591 consultations may be provided as necessary. 592 (2)âThe agency may charge an initial fee of $2,000 for 593 review of plans and construction on all projects, which is 594 nonrefundable. The agency may also collect a fee, not to exceed 595 1 percent of the estimated construction cost or the actual cost 596 of review, whichever is less, for the portion of the review 597 which encompasses initial review through the initial revised 598 construction document review. The agency is further authorized 599 to collect its actual costs on all subsequent portions of the 600 review and construction inspections. The initial fee payment 601 must accompany the initial submission of plans and 602 specifications. Any subsequent payment that is due is payable 603 upon receipt of the invoice from the agency. 604 Section 10.âSection 396.209, Florida Statutes, is created 605 to read: 606 396.209âRebates prohibited; penalties.â 607 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person to pay or receive any 608 commission, bonus, kickback, or rebate or engage in any split 609 fee arrangement, in any form whatsoever, with any physician, 610 surgeon, organization, or person, either directly or indirectly, 611 for patients referred to a licensed facility. 612 (2)âThe agency shall enforce subsection (1). In the case of 613 an entity not licensed by the agency, administrative penalties 614 may include: 615 (a)âA fine not to exceed $1,000. 616 (b)âIf applicable, a recommendation by the agency to the 617 appropriate regulatory board that disciplinary action be taken. 618 Section 11.âSection 396.211, Florida Statutes, is created 619 to read: 620 396.211âStaff membership and clinical privileges.â 621 (1)âA licensed facility, in considering and acting upon an 622 application for staff membership or clinical privileges, may not 623 deny the application of a qualified doctor of medicine licensed 624 under chapter 458, a doctor of osteopathic medicine licensed 625 under chapter 459, a doctor of dentistry licensed under chapter 626 466, or a doctor of podiatric medicine licensed under chapter 627 461 for such staff membership or clinical privileges within the 628 scope of his or her respective licensure solely because the 629 applicant is licensed under any of such chapters. 630 (2)(a)âEach licensed facility shall establish rules and 631 procedures for consideration of an application for clinical 632 privileges submitted by a physician assistant licensed pursuant 633 to s. 458.347 or s. 459.022. Clinical privileges granted to a 634 physician assistant pursuant to this subsection automatically 635 terminate upon termination of staff membership of the physician 636 assistantâs supervising physician. 637 (b)âAn advanced practice registered nurse who is certified 638 as a registered nurse anesthetist licensed under part I of 639 chapter 464 may administer anesthesia under the onsite medical 640 direction of a professional licensed under chapter 458, chapter 641 459, or chapter 466, and in accordance with an established 642 protocol approved by the medical staff. The medical direction 643 must specifically address the needs of the individual patient. 644 (c)âA circulating nurse must be present in the operating 645 room for the duration of a surgical procedure. 646 (3)âWhen a licensed facility requires, as a precondition to 647 obtaining staff membership or clinical privileges, the 648 completion of, eligibility in, or graduation from any program or 649 society established by or relating to the American Medical 650 Association or the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the 651 licensed facility must also make available such membership or 652 privileges to physicians who have attained completion of, 653 eligibility in, or graduation from any equivalent program 654 established by or relating to the American Osteopathic 655 Association. 656 (4)âThis section does not restrict in any way the authority 657 of the medical staff of a licensed facility to review for 658 approval or disapproval all applications for appointment and 659 reappointment to all categories of staff and to make 660 recommendations on each applicant to the governing board of the 661 facility, including the delineation of privileges to be granted 662 in each case. In making such recommendations and in the 663 delineation of privileges, each applicant must be considered 664 individually pursuant to criteria for a doctor licensed under 665 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 461, or chapter 466; or for an 666 advanced practice registered nurse licensed under part I of 667 chapter 464, as applicable. The applicantâs eligibility for 668 staff membership or clinical privileges must be determined by 669 the applicantâs background, experience, health, training, and 670 demonstrated competency; the applicantâs adherence to applicable 671 professional ethics; the applicantâs reputation; and the 672 applicantâs ability to work with others, and by such other 673 elements as determined by the governing board consistent with 674 this chapter. 675 (5)âThe governing board of each licensed facility shall set 676 standards and procedures to be applied by the licensed facility 677 and its medical staff in considering and acting upon 678 applications for staff membership or clinical privileges. Such 679 standards and procedures must be made available for public 680 inspection. 681 (6)âUpon the written request of the applicant, any licensed 682 facility that has denied staff membership or clinical privileges 683 to an applicant specified in subsection (1) or subsection (2) 684 must, within 30 days after such request, provide the applicant 685 with the reasons for such denial in writing. A denial of staff 686 membership or clinical privileges to any applicant must be 687 submitted, in writing, to the applicantâs respective regulatory 688 board. 689 (7)âThere is no monetary liability on the part of, and no 690 cause of action for injunctive relief or damages may arise 691 against, any licensed facility, its governing board or governing 692 board members, medical staff, or disciplinary board or against 693 its agents, investigators, witnesses, or employees, or against 694 any other person, for any action arising out of or related to 695 carrying out this section, absent intentional fraud. 696 (8)âThe investigations, proceedings, and records of the 697 board, or its agent with whom there is a specific written 698 contract for the purposes of this section, as described in this 699 section are not subject to discovery or introduction into 700 evidence in any civil action against a provider of professional 701 health services arising out of matters that are the subject of 702 evaluation and review by such board, and any person who was in 703 attendance at a meeting of such board or its agent is not 704 permitted or required to testify in any such civil action as to 705 any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the 706 proceedings of such board or its agent or as to any findings, 707 recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of such 708 board or its agent or any members thereof. However, information, 709 documents, or records otherwise available from original sources 710 are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any 711 such civil action merely because they were presented during 712 proceedings of such board; nor may any person who testifies 713 before such board or who is a member of such board be prevented 714 from testifying as to matters within his or her knowledge, but 715 such witness cannot be asked about his or her testimony before 716 such a board or opinions formed by him or her as a result of 717 such board hearings. 718 (9)(a)âIf the defendant prevails in an action brought by an 719 applicant against any person or entity that initiated, 720 participated in, was a witness in, or conducted any review as 721 authorized by this section, the court must award reasonable 722 attorney fees and costs to the defendant. 723 (b)âAs a condition of an applicant bringing any action 724 against any person or entity that initiated, participated in, 725 was a witness in, or conducted any review as authorized by this 726 section and before any responsive pleading is due, the applicant 727 must post a bond or other security, as set by the court having 728 jurisdiction in the action, in an amount sufficient to pay the 729 costs and attorney fees. 730 Section 12.âSection 396.212, Florida Statutes, is created 731 to read: 732 396.212âLicensed facilities; peer review; disciplinary 733 powers; agency or partnership with physicians.â 734 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that good faith 735 participants in the process of investigating and disciplining 736 physicians pursuant to the state-mandated peer review process 737 shall, in addition to receiving immunity from retaliatory tort 738 suits pursuant to s. 456.073(12), be protected from federal 739 antitrust suits filed under the Sherman Antitrust Act, 15 U.S.C. 740 ss. 1 et seq. Such intent is within the public policy of the 741 state to secure the provision of quality medical services to the 742 public. 743 (2)âEach licensed facility, as a condition of licensure, 744 shall provide for peer review of physicians who deliver health 745 care services at the facility. Each licensed facility shall 746 develop written, binding procedures by which such peer review 747 must be conducted. Such procedures must include all of the 748 following: 749 (a)âA mechanism for choosing the membership of the body or 750 bodies that conduct peer review. 751 (b)âAdoption of rules of order for the peer review process. 752 (c)âFair review of the case with the physician involved. 753 (d)âA mechanism to identify and avoid conflicts of interest 754 on the part of the peer review panel members. 755 (e)âRecording of agendas and minutes that do not contain 756 confidential material, for review by the Division of Health 757 Quality Assurance of the agency. 758 (f)âA review, at least annually, of the peer review 759 procedures by the governing board of the licensed facility. 760 (g)âFocusing the peer review process on reviewing 761 professional practices at the facility to reduce morbidity and 762 mortality and to improve patient care. 763 (3)âIf reasonable belief exists that conduct by a staff 764 member or physician who delivers health care services at the 765 licensed facility may constitute one or more grounds for 766 discipline as provided in this subsection, a peer review panel 767 must investigate and determine whether grounds for discipline 768 exist with respect to such staff member or physician. The 769 governing board of a licensed facility, after considering the 770 recommendations of its peer review panel, shall suspend, deny, 771 revoke, or curtail the privileges, or reprimand, counsel, or 772 require education, of any such staff member or physician after a 773 final determination has been made that one or more of the 774 following grounds exist: 775 (a)âIncompetence. 776 (b)âBeing found to be a habitual user of intoxicants or 777 drugs to the extent that the staff member or physician is deemed 778 dangerous to himself, herself, or others. 779 (c)âMental or physical impairment that may adversely affect 780 patient care. 781 (d)âBeing found liable by a court of competent jurisdiction 782 for medical negligence or malpractice involving negligent 783 conduct. 784 (e)âOne or more settlements exceeding $10,000 for medical 785 negligence or malpractice involving negligent conduct by the 786 staff member or physician. 787 (f)âMedical negligence other than as specified in paragraph 788 (d) or paragraph (e). 789 (g)âFailure to comply with the policies, procedures, or 790 directives of the risk management program or any quality 791 assurance committees of any licensed facility. 792 (4)âPursuant to ss. 458.337 and 459.016, any disciplinary 793 action taken under subsection (3) must be reported in writing to 794 the Division of Medical Quality Assurance of the Department of 795 Health within 30 working days after its initial occurrence, 796 regardless of the pendency of appeals to the governing board of 797 the licensed facility. The report must identify the disciplined 798 practitioner, the action taken, and the reason for such action. 799 All final disciplinary actions taken under subsection (3), if 800 different from those reported to the agency within 30 days after 801 its initial occurrence, must be reported within 10 working days 802 to the Division of Medical Quality Assurance in writing and must 803 specify the disciplinary action taken and the specific grounds 804 therefor. The division shall review each report and determine 805 whether it potentially involved conduct by the licensee which is 806 subject to disciplinary action, in which case s. 456.073 807 applies. The reports are not subject to inspection under s. 808 119.07(1) even if the divisionâs investigation results in a 809 finding of probable cause. 810 (5)âThere is no monetary liability on the part of, and no 811 cause of action for damages may rise against, any licensed 812 facility, its governing board or governing board members, peer 813 review panel, medical staff, or disciplinary body, or its 814 agents, investigators, witnesses, or employees; a committee of a 815 licensed facility; or any other person for any action taken 816 without intentional fraud in carrying out this section. 817 (6)âFor a single incident or series of isolated incidents 818 that are nonwillful violations of the reporting requirements of 819 this section or part II of chapter 408, the agency shall first 820 seek to obtain corrective action by the licensed facility. If 821 correction is not demonstrated within the timeframe established 822 by the agency or if there is a pattern of nonwillful violations 823 of this section or part II of chapter 408, the agency may impose 824 an administrative fine, not to exceed $5,000 for any violation 825 of the reporting requirements of this section or part II of 826 chapter 408. The administrative fine for repeated nonwillful 827 violations may not exceed $10,000 for any violation. The 828 administrative fine for each intentional and willful violation 829 may not exceed $25,000 per violation, per day. The fine for an 830 intentional and willful violation of this section or part II of 831 chapter 408 may not exceed $250,000. In determining the amount 832 of fine to be levied, the agency shall be guided by s. 833 396.219(2)(b). 834 (7)âThe proceedings and records of peer review panels, 835 committees, and governing boards or agents thereof which relate 836 solely to actions taken in carrying out this section are not 837 subject to inspection under s. 119.07(1); and meetings held 838 pursuant to achieving the objectives of such panels, committees, 839 and governing boards or agents thereof are not open to the 840 public under chapter 286. 841 (8)âThe investigations, proceedings, and records of the 842 peer review panel, a committee of an ambulatory surgical center, 843 a disciplinary board, or a governing board, or agents thereof 844 with whom there is a specific written contract for that purpose, 845 as described in this section, are not subject to discovery or 846 introduction into evidence in any civil or administrative action 847 against a provider of professional health services arising out 848 of the matters that are the subject of evaluation and review by 849 such group or its agent, and a person who was in attendance at a 850 meeting of such group or its agent is not permitted and may not 851 be required to testify in any such civil or administrative 852 action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented 853 during the proceedings of such group or its agent or as to any 854 findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other 855 actions of such group or its agent or any members thereof. 856 However, information, documents, or records otherwise available 857 from original sources are not to be construed as immune from 858 discovery or use in any such civil or administrative action 859 merely because such information, documents, or records were 860 presented during proceedings of such group, and any person who 861 testifies before such group or who is a member of such group may 862 not be prevented from testifying as to matters within his or her 863 knowledge, but such witness may not be asked about his or her 864 testimony before such a group or opinions formed by him or her 865 as a result of such group hearings. 866 (9)(a)âIf the defendant prevails in an action brought by a 867 staff member or physician who delivers health care services at 868 the licensed facility against any person or entity that 869 initiated, participated in, was a witness in, or conducted any 870 review as authorized by this section, the court must award 871 reasonable attorney fees and costs to the defendant. 872 (b)âAs a condition of any staff member or physician 873 bringing any action against any person or entity that initiated, 874 participated in, was a witness in, or conducted any review as 875 authorized by this section and before any responsive pleading is 876 due, the staff member or physician must post a bond or other 877 security, as set by the court having jurisdiction in the action, 878 in an amount sufficient to pay the costs and attorney fees. 879 Section 13.âSection 396.213, Florida Statutes, is created 880 to read: 881 396.213âInternal risk management program.â 882 (1)âEvery licensed facility shall, as a part of its 883 administrative functions, establish an internal risk management 884 program that includes all of the following components: 885 (a)âThe investigation and analysis of the frequency and 886 causes of general categories and specific types of adverse 887 incidents to patients. 888 (b)âThe development of appropriate measures to minimize the 889 risk of adverse incidents to patients, including, but not 890 limited to: 891 1.âRisk management and risk prevention education and 892 training of all nonphysician personnel as follows: 893 a.âSuch education and training of all nonphysician 894 personnel as part of their initial orientation; and 895 b.âAt least 1 hour of such education and training annually 896 for all personnel of the licensed facility working in clinical 897 areas and providing patient care, except those persons licensed 898 as health care practitioners who are required to complete 899 continuing education coursework pursuant to chapter 456 or the 900 practitionerâs respective practice act. 901 2.âA prohibition, except when emergency circumstances 902 require otherwise, against a staff member of the licensed 903 facility attending a patient in the recovery room, unless the 904 staff member is authorized to attend the patient in the recovery 905 room and is in the company of at least one other person. 906 However, a licensed facility is exempt from the two-person 907 requirement if it has: 908 a.âLive visual observation; 909 b.âElectronic observation; or 910 c.âAny other reasonable measure taken to ensure patient 911 protection and privacy. 912 3.âA prohibition against an unlicensed person assisting or 913 participating in any surgical procedure unless the licensed 914 facility has authorized the person to do so following a 915 competency assessment, and such assistance or participation is 916 done under the direct and immediate supervision of a licensed 917 physician and is not otherwise an activity that may be performed 918 only by a licensed health care practitioner. 919 4.âDevelopment, implementation, and ongoing evaluation of 920 procedures, protocols, and systems to accurately identify 921 patients, planned procedures, and the correct site of planned 922 procedures so as to minimize the performance of a surgical 923 procedure on the wrong patient, a wrong surgical procedure, a 924 wrong-site surgical procedure, or a surgical procedure otherwise 925 unrelated to the patientâs diagnosis or medical condition. 926 (c)âThe analysis of patient grievances that relate to 927 patient care and the quality of medical services. 928 (d)âA system for informing a patient or an individual 929 identified pursuant to s. 765.401(1) that the patient was the 930 subject of an adverse incident, as defined in subsection (5). 931 Such notice must be given by an appropriately trained person 932 designated by the licensed facility as soon as practicable to 933 allow the patient an opportunity to minimize damage or injury. 934 (e)âThe development and implementation of an incident 935 reporting system based upon the affirmative duty of all health 936 care providers and all agents and employees of the licensed 937 facility to report adverse incidents to the risk manager, or to 938 his or her designee, within 3 business days after the occurrence 939 of such incidents. 940 (2)âThe internal risk management program is the 941 responsibility of the governing board of the licensed facility. 942 Each licensed facility shall hire a risk manager who is 943 responsible for implementation and oversight of the facilityâs 944 internal risk management program and who demonstrates 945 competence, through education or experience, in all of the 946 following areas: 947 (a)âApplicable standards of health care risk management. 948 (b)âApplicable federal, state, and local health and safety 949 laws and rules. 950 (c)âGeneral risk management administration. 951 (d)âPatient care. 952 (e)âMedical care. 953 (f)âPersonal and social care. 954 (g)âAccident prevention. 955 (h)âDepartmental organization and management. 956 (i)âCommunity interrelationships. 957 (j)âMedical terminology. 958 (3)âIn addition to the programs mandated by this section, 959 other innovative approaches intended to reduce the frequency and 960 severity of medical malpractice and patient injury claims are 961 encouraged and their implementation and operation facilitated. 962 Such additional approaches may include extending internal risk 963 management programs to health care providersâ offices and the 964 assuming of provider liability by a licensed facility for acts 965 or omissions occurring within the licensed facility. Each 966 licensed facility shall annually report to the agency and the 967 department the name and judgments entered against each health 968 care practitioner for which it assumes liability. The agency and 969 the department shall, in their respective annual reports, 970 include statistics that report the number of licensed facilities 971 that assume such liability and the number of health care 972 practitioners, by profession, for whom they assume liability. 973 (4)âThe agency shall adopt rules governing the 974 establishment of internal risk management programs to meet the 975 needs of individual licensed facilities. Each internal risk 976 management program shall include the use of incident reports to 977 be filed with a responsible individual who is competent in risk 978 management techniques, such as an insurance coordinator, in the 979 employ of each licensed facility or who is retained by the 980 licensed facility as a consultant. The individual responsible 981 for the risk management program shall have free access to all 982 medical records of the licensed facility. The incident reports 983 are part of the workpapers of the attorney defending the 984 licensed facility in litigation relating to the licensed 985 facility and are subject to discovery, but are not admissible as 986 evidence in court. A person filing an incident report is not 987 subject to civil suit by virtue of such incident report. As a 988 part of each internal risk management program, the incident 989 reports must be used to develop categories of incidents which 990 identify problem areas. Once identified, procedures must be 991 adjusted to correct the problem areas. 992 (5)âFor purposes of reporting to the agency pursuant to 993 this section, the term âadverse incidentâ means an event over 994 which health care personnel could exercise control and which is 995 associated in whole or in part with medical intervention, rather 996 than the condition for which such intervention occurred, and 997 which: 998 (a)âResults in one of the following outcomes: 999 1.âDeath; 1000 2.âBrain or spinal damage; 1001 3.âPermanent disfigurement; 1002 4.âFracture or dislocation of bones or joints; 1003 5.âA resulting limitation of neurological, physical, or 1004 sensory function which continues after discharge from the 1005 licensed facility; or 1006 6.âAny condition that required specialized medical 1007 attention or surgical intervention resulting from nonemergency 1008 medical intervention, other than an emergency medical condition, 1009 to which the patient has not given his or her informed consent; 1010 (b)âWas the performance of a surgical procedure on the 1011 wrong patient, a wrong surgical procedure, a wrong-site surgical 1012 procedure, or a surgical procedure otherwise unrelated to the 1013 patientâs diagnosis or medical condition; 1014 (c)âRequired the surgical repair of damage resulting to a 1015 patient from a planned surgical procedure, where the damage was 1016 not a recognized specific risk, as disclosed to the patient and 1017 documented through the informed-consent process; or 1018 (d)âWas a procedure to remove unplanned foreign objects 1019 remaining from a surgical procedure. 1020 (6)(a)âEach licensed facility subject to this section shall 1021 submit an annual report to the agency summarizing the adverse 1022 incident reports that have been filed in the facility for that 1023 year. The report must include: 1024 1.âThe total number of adverse incidents. 1025 2.âA listing, by category, of the types of operations, 1026 diagnostic or treatment procedures, or other actions causing the 1027 injuries, and the number of incidents occurring within each 1028 category. 1029 3.âA listing, by category, of the types of injuries caused 1030 and the number of incidents occurring within each category. 1031 4.âA code number using the health care professionalâs 1032 licensure number and a separate code number identifying all 1033 other individuals directly involved in adverse incidents to 1034 patients, the relationship of the individual to the licensed 1035 facility, and the number of incidents in which each individual 1036 has been directly involved. Each licensed facility shall 1037 maintain names of the health care professionals and individuals 1038 identified by code numbers for purposes of this section. 1039 5.âA description of all malpractice claims filed against 1040 the licensed facility, including the total number of pending and 1041 closed claims and the nature of the incident which led to, the 1042 persons involved in, and the status and disposition of each 1043 claim. Each report must update status and disposition for all 1044 prior claims pending. 1045 (b)âThe information reported to the agency pursuant to 1046 paragraph (a) which relates to persons licensed under chapter 1047 458, chapter 459, chapter 461, or chapter 466 must be reviewed 1048 by the agency. The agency shall determine whether any of the 1049 incidents potentially involved conduct by a health care 1050 professional who is subject to disciplinary action, in which 1051 case s. 456.073 applies. 1052 (c)âThe report submitted to the agency must also contain 1053 the name of the risk manager of the licensed facility, a copy of 1054 the policies and procedures governing the measures taken by the 1055 licensed facility and its risk manager to reduce the risk of 1056 injuries and adverse incidents, and the results of such 1057 measures. The annual report is confidential and is not available 1058 to the public pursuant to s. 119.07(1) or any other law 1059 providing access to public records. The annual report is not 1060 discoverable or admissible in any civil or administrative 1061 action, except in disciplinary proceedings by the agency or the 1062 appropriate regulatory board. The annual report is not available 1063 to the public as part of the record of investigation for and 1064 prosecution in disciplinary proceedings made available to the 1065 public by the agency or the appropriate regulatory board. 1066 However, the agency or the appropriate regulatory board shall 1067 make available, upon written request by a health care 1068 professional against whom probable cause has been found, any 1069 such records which form the basis of the determination of 1070 probable cause. 1071 (7)âAny of the following adverse incidents, whether 1072 occurring in the licensed facility or arising from health care 1073 services administered before the patientâs admission to the 1074 licensed facility, must be reported by the licensed facility to 1075 the agency within 15 calendar days after its occurrence: 1076 (a)âThe death of a patient; 1077 (b)âBrain or spinal damage to a patient; 1078 (c)âThe performance of a surgical procedure on the wrong 1079 patient; 1080 (d)âThe performance of a wrong-site surgical procedure; 1081 (e)âThe performance of a wrong surgical procedure; 1082 (f)âThe performance of a surgical procedure that is 1083 medically unnecessary or otherwise unrelated to the patientâs 1084 diagnosis or medical condition; 1085 (g)âThe surgical repair of damage resulting to a patient 1086 from a planned surgical procedure, where the damage is not a 1087 recognized specific risk, as disclosed to the patient and 1088 documented through the informed-consent process; or 1089 (h)âThe performance of procedures to remove unplanned 1090 foreign objects remaining from a surgical procedure. 1091 1092 The agency may grant extensions to this reporting requirement 1093 for no more than 15 days upon justification submitted in writing 1094 to the agency by the licensed facility administrator. The agency 1095 may require an additional, final report. These reports are not 1096 available to the public pursuant to s. 119.07(1) or any other 1097 law providing access to public records, nor discoverable or 1098 admissible in any civil or administrative action, except in 1099 disciplinary proceedings by the agency or the appropriate 1100 regulatory board, nor available to the public as part of the 1101 record of investigation for and prosecution in disciplinary 1102 proceedings made available to the public by the agency or the 1103 appropriate regulatory board. However, the agency or the 1104 appropriate regulatory board shall make available, upon written 1105 request by a health care professional against whom probable 1106 cause has been found, any such records that form the basis of 1107 the determination of probable cause. The agency may, as it deems 1108 appropriate, investigate any such incident and prescribe 1109 measures that must or may be taken in response to the incident. 1110 The agency shall review each incident and determine whether it 1111 potentially involved conduct by the health care professional, 1112 who would be subject to disciplinary action, in which case s. 1113 456.073 applies. 1114 (8)âThe agency shall publish on the agencyâs website, at 1115 least quarterly, a summary and trend analysis of adverse 1116 incident reports received pursuant to this section, which may 1117 not include information that would identify the patient, the 1118 reporting facility, or the health care practitioners involved. 1119 The agency shall publish on the agencyâs website an annual 1120 summary and trend analysis of all adverse incident reports and 1121 malpractice claims information provided by licensed facilities 1122 in their annual reports, which may not include information that 1123 would identify the patient, the reporting facility, or the 1124 practitioners involved. The purpose of the publication of the 1125 summary and trend analysis is to promote the rapid dissemination 1126 of information relating to adverse incidents and malpractice 1127 claims to assist licensed facilities in avoiding similar 1128 incidents and reduce morbidity and mortality. 1129 (9)âThe internal risk manager of each licensed facility 1130 shall: 1131 (a)âInvestigate every allegation of sexual misconduct which 1132 is made against a member of the licensed facilityâs staff who 1133 has direct patient contact, when the allegation is that the 1134 sexual misconduct occurred at the facility or on the grounds of 1135 the facility. 1136 (b)âReport every allegation of sexual misconduct to the 1137 administrator of the licensed facility. 1138 (c)âNotify the family or guardian of the victim, if a 1139 minor, that an allegation of sexual misconduct has been made and 1140 that an investigation is being conducted. 1141 (d)âReport to the department every allegation of sexual 1142 misconduct by a licensed health care practitioner which involves 1143 a patient. 1144 (10)âAny witness who witnessed or who possesses actual 1145 knowledge of the act that is the basis of an allegation of 1146 sexual abuse shall: 1147 (a)âNotify the local police; and 1148 (b)âNotify the risk manager and the administrator. 1149 1150 For purposes of this subsection, the term âsexual abuseâ means 1151 acts of a sexual nature committed for the sexual gratification 1152 of anyone upon or in the presence of a vulnerable adult as 1153 defined in s. 415.102, without the vulnerable adultâs informed 1154 consent, or upon or in the presence of a minor. The term 1155 includes, but is not limited to, the acts defined in s. 1156 794.011(1)(j), fondling, exposure of a vulnerable adultâs or 1157 minorâs sexual organs, or the use of the vulnerable adult or 1158 minor to solicit for or engage in prostitution or sexual 1159 performance. The term does not include any act intended for a 1160 valid medical purpose or any act which may reasonably be 1161 construed to be a normal caregiving action. 1162 (11)âA person who, with malice or with intent to discredit 1163 or harm a licensed facility or any person, makes a false 1164 allegation of sexual misconduct against a member of a licensed 1165 facilityâs staff commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 1166 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1167 (12)âIn addition to any penalty imposed pursuant to this 1168 section or part II of chapter 408, the agency shall require a 1169 written plan of correction from the licensed facility. For a 1170 single incident or series of isolated incidents that are 1171 nonwillful violations of the reporting requirements of this 1172 section or part II of chapter 408, the agency shall first seek 1173 to obtain corrective action by the licensed facility. If the 1174 correction is not demonstrated within the timeframe established 1175 by the agency or if there is a pattern of nonwillful violations 1176 of this section or part II of chapter 408, the agency may impose 1177 an administrative fine, not to exceed $5,000 for any violation 1178 of the reporting requirements of this section or part II of 1179 chapter 408. The administrative fine for repeated nonwillful 1180 violations may not exceed $10,000 for any violation. The 1181 administrative fine for each intentional and willful violation 1182 may not exceed $25,000 per violation, per day. The fine for an 1183 intentional and willful violation of this section or part II of 1184 chapter 408 may not exceed $250,000. In determining the amount 1185 of fine to be levied, the agency shall be guided by s. 1186 396.219(2)(b). 1187 (13)âThe agency shall be given access to all licensed 1188 facility records necessary to carry out this section. The 1189 records obtained by the agency under subsection (6), subsection 1190 (7), or subsection (9) are not available to the public under s. 1191 119.07(1), nor discoverable or admissible in any civil or 1192 administrative action, except in disciplinary proceedings by the 1193 agency or the appropriate regulatory board, nor are records 1194 obtained pursuant to s. 456.071 available to the public as part 1195 of the record of investigation for and prosecution in 1196 disciplinary proceedings made available to the public by the 1197 agency or the appropriate regulatory board. However, the agency 1198 or the appropriate regulatory board shall make available, upon 1199 written request by a health care practitioner against whom 1200 probable cause has been found, any such records that form the 1201 basis of the determination of probable cause, except that, with 1202 respect to medical review committee records, s. 766.101 1203 controls. 1204 (14)âThe meetings of the committees and governing board of 1205 a licensed facility held solely for the purpose of achieving the 1206 objectives of risk management as provided by this section may 1207 not be open to the public under chapter 286. The records of such 1208 meetings are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), except 1209 as provided in subsection (13). 1210 (15)âThe agency shall review, as part of its licensure 1211 review process, the internal risk management program at each 1212 licensed facility regulated by this section to determine whether 1213 the program meets standards established in statutes and rules, 1214 whether the program is being conducted in a manner designed to 1215 reduce adverse incidents, and whether the program is 1216 appropriately reporting incidents under this section. 1217 (16)âThere is no monetary liability on the part of, and no 1218 cause of action for damages may arise against, any risk manager 1219 for the implementation and oversight of the internal risk 1220 management program in a facility licensed under this chapter as 1221 required by this section, for any act or proceeding undertaken 1222 or performed within the scope of the functions of such internal 1223 risk management program, if the risk manager acts without 1224 intentional fraud. 1225 (17)âA privilege against civil liability is granted to any 1226 risk manager or licensed facility with regard to information 1227 furnished pursuant to this chapter, unless the risk manager or 1228 facility acted in bad faith or with malice in providing such 1229 information. 1230 (18)âIf the agency, through its receipt of any report 1231 required under this section or through any investigation, has a 1232 reasonable belief that conduct by a staff member or employee of 1233 a licensed facility is grounds for disciplinary action by the 1234 appropriate regulatory board, the agency must report this fact 1235 to such regulatory board. 1236 (19)âIt is unlawful for any person to coerce, intimidate, 1237 or preclude a risk manager from lawfully executing his or her 1238 reporting obligations pursuant to this chapter. Such unlawful 1239 action is subject to civil monetary penalties not to exceed 1240 $10,000 per violation. 1241 Section 14.âSection 396.214, Florida Statutes, is created 1242 to read: 1243 396.214âIdentification, segregation, and separation of 1244 biomedical waste.âEach licensed facility shall comply with the 1245 requirements in s. 381.0098 relating to biomedical waste. Any 1246 transporter or potential transporter of such waste must be 1247 notified of the existence and locations of such waste. 1248 Section 15.âSection 396.215, Florida Statutes, is created 1249 to read: 1250 396.215âPatient safety.â 1251 (1)âEach licensed facility shall adopt a patient safety 1252 plan. A plan adopted to implement the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 1253 s. 416.43 is deemed to comply with this requirement. 1254 (2)âEach licensed facility shall appoint a patient safety 1255 officer and a patient safety committee, which must include at 1256 least one person who is neither employed by nor practicing at 1257 the facility, for the purpose of promoting the health and safety 1258 of patients, reviewing and evaluating the quality of patient 1259 safety measures used by the facility, and assisting in the 1260 implementation of the facility patient safety plan. 1261 (3)âEach licensed facility shall, at least biennially, 1262 conduct a patient safety culture survey using the applicable 1263 Survey on Patient Safety Culture developed by the federal Agency 1264 for Healthcare Research and Quality. Each licensed facility 1265 shall conduct the survey anonymously to encourage completion of 1266 the survey by staff working in or employed by the facility. Each 1267 licensed facility may contract to administer the survey. Each 1268 licensed facility shall biennially submit the survey data to the 1269 agency in a format specified by rule, which must include the 1270 survey participation rate. Each licensed facility may develop an 1271 internal action plan between conducting surveys to identify 1272 measures to improve the survey and submit the plan to the 1273 agency. 1274 (4)âEach licensed facility shall: 1275 (a)âDevelop and implement policies and procedures for the 1276 rendering of appropriate medical care for persons at risk of 1277 forming venous thromboembolisms which reflect evidence-based 1278 best practices relating to, at a minimum: 1279 1.âAssessing patients for risk of venous thromboembolism 1280 using a nationally recognized risk assessment tool. 1281 2.âTreatment options for a patient diagnosed with venous 1282 thromboembolism. 1283 (b)âTrain all nonphysician personnel at least annually on 1284 the policies and procedures developed under this subsection. For 1285 purposes of this subsection, the term ânonphysician personnelâ 1286 means all personnel of the licensed facility working in clinical 1287 areas and providing patient care, except those persons licensed 1288 as health care practitioners. 1289 Section 16.âSection 396.216, Florida Statutes, is created 1290 to read: 1291 396.216âCases of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect; 1292 duties.âEach licensed facility shall adopt protocols that, at a 1293 minimum, require the facility to: 1294 (1)âIncorporate a facility policy that every staff member 1295 has an affirmative duty to report, pursuant to chapter 39, any 1296 actual or suspected case of child abuse, abandonment, or 1297 neglect; and 1298 (2)âIn any case involving suspected child abuse, 1299 abandonment, or neglect, designate, at the request of the 1300 Department of Children and Families, a staff physician to act as 1301 a liaison between the licensed facility and the Department of 1302 Children and Families office that is investigating the suspected 1303 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, and the Child Protection Team, 1304 as defined in s. 39.01, when the case is referred to such a 1305 team. 1306 Section 17.âSection 396.217, Florida Statutes, is created 1307 to read: 1308 396.217âDuty to notify patients.âAn appropriately trained 1309 person designated by each licensed facility shall inform each 1310 patient, or an individual identified pursuant to s. 765.401(1), 1311 in person about adverse incidents that result in serious harm to 1312 the patient. Notifications of outcomes of care that result in 1313 harm to the patient under this section do not constitute an 1314 acknowledgment or admission of liability, and may not be 1315 introduced as evidence. 1316 Section 18.âSection 396.218, Florida Statutes, is created 1317 to read: 1318 396.218âRules and enforcement.â 1319 (1)âThe agency shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) 1320 and 120.54 to implement this chapter, which must include 1321 reasonable and fair minimum standards for ensuring that: 1322 (a)âSufficient numbers and qualified types of personnel and 1323 occupational disciplines are on duty and available at all times 1324 to provide necessary and adequate patient care and safety. 1325 (b)âInfection control, housekeeping, sanitary conditions, 1326 and medical record procedures that will adequately protect 1327 patient care and safety are established and implemented. 1328 (c)âA comprehensive emergency management plan is prepared 1329 and updated annually. Standards for such plans must be included 1330 in the rules adopted by the agency after consulting with the 1331 Division of Emergency Management. At a minimum, the rules must 1332 provide for plan components that address emergency evacuation 1333 transportation; adequate sheltering arrangements; postdisaster 1334 activities, including emergency power, food, and water; 1335 postdisaster transportation; supplies; staffing; emergency 1336 equipment; individual identification of residents and transfer 1337 of records; and responding to family inquiries. The 1338 comprehensive emergency management plan is subject to review and 1339 approval by the local emergency management agency. During its 1340 review, the local emergency management agency shall ensure that 1341 the following agencies, at a minimum, are given the opportunity 1342 to review the plan: the Agency for Health Care Administration, 1343 the Department of Elderly Affairs, the Department of Health, and 1344 the Division of Emergency Management. Also, appropriate 1345 volunteer organizations must be given the opportunity to review 1346 the plan. The local emergency management agency shall complete 1347 its review within 60 days and either approve the plan or advise 1348 the licensed facility of necessary revisions. 1349 (d)âLicensed facilities are established, organized, and 1350 operated consistently with established standards and rules. 1351 (e)âLicensed facility beds conform to minimum space, 1352 equipment, and furnishings standards as specified by the agency. 1353 (f)âEach licensed facility has a quality improvement 1354 program designed to enhance quality of care and to emphasize 1355 quality patient outcomes, corrective action for problems, 1356 governing board review, and reporting to the agency of 1357 standardized data elements necessary to analyze quality of care 1358 outcomes. The agency shall use existing data, when available, 1359 and may not duplicate the efforts of other state agencies in 1360 order to obtain such data. 1361 (g)âLicensed facilities make available on their websites, 1362 and in a hard copy format upon request, a description of and a 1363 link to the patient charge and performance outcome data 1364 collected from licensed facilities pursuant to s. 408.061. 1365 (2)âThe agency shall adopt rules that establish minimum 1366 standards for pediatric patient care in ambulatory surgical 1367 centers to ensure the safe and effective delivery of surgical 1368 care to children. Such standards must include quality of care, 1369 nurse staffing, physician staffing, and equipment standards. 1370 Ambulatory surgical centers may not provide operative procedures 1371 to children under 18 years of age which require a length of stay 1372 past midnight unless such standards are established by rule. 1373 (3)âAny rule adopted under this chapter by the agency may 1374 not deny a license to a facility required to be licensed under 1375 this chapter solely by reason of the school or system of 1376 practice employed or permitted to be employed by physicians 1377 therein, provided that such school or system of practice is 1378 recognized by the laws of this state. However, this subsection 1379 does not limit the powers of the agency to provide and require 1380 minimum standards for the maintenance and operation of, and for 1381 the treatment of patients in, those licensed facilities that 1382 receive federal aid, in order to meet minimum standards related 1383 to such matters in such licensed facilities which may now or 1384 hereafter be required by appropriate federal officers or 1385 agencies pursuant to federal law or rules adopted pursuant 1386 thereto. 1387 (4)âAny licensed facility that is in operation at the time 1388 of adoption of any applicable rule under this chapter must be 1389 given a reasonable time, under the particular circumstances, but 1390 not to exceed 1 year after the date of such adoption, within 1391 which to comply with such rule. 1392 (5)âThe agency may not adopt any rule governing the design, 1393 construction, erection, alteration, modification, repair, or 1394 demolition of any ambulatory surgical center. It is the intent 1395 of the Legislature to preempt that function to the Florida 1396 Building Commission and the State Fire Marshal through adoption 1397 and maintenance of the Florida Building Code and the Florida 1398 Fire Prevention Code. However, the agency shall provide 1399 technical assistance to the commission and the State Fire 1400 Marshal in updating the construction standards of the Florida 1401 Building Code and the Florida Fire Prevention Code which govern 1402 ambulatory surgical centers. 1403 Section 19.âSection 396.219, Florida Statutes, is created 1404 to read: 1405 396.219âCriminal and administrative penalties; moratorium.â 1406 (1)âIn addition to the penalties provided in s. 408.812, a 1407 person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any 1408 facility without a license under this chapter commits a 1409 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than 1410 $500 for the first offense and not more than $1,000 for each 1411 subsequent offense, and each day of continuing violation after 1412 conviction is considered a separate offense. 1413 (2)(a)âThe agency may impose an administrative fine, not to 1414 exceed $1,000 per violation, per day, for the violation of any 1415 provision of this chapter, part II of chapter 408, or applicable 1416 rules. Each day of violation constitutes a separate violation 1417 and is subject to a separate fine. 1418 (b)âIn determining the amount of fine to be levied for a 1419 violation, as provided in paragraph (a), the following factors 1420 must be considered: 1421 1.âThe severity of the violation, including the probability 1422 that death or serious harm to the health or safety of any person 1423 will result or has resulted, the severity of the actual or 1424 potential harm, and the extent to which the provisions of this 1425 chapter were violated. 1426 2.âActions taken by the licensee to correct the violations 1427 or to remedy complaints. 1428 3.âAny previous violations of the licensee. 1429 (c)âThe agency may impose an administrative fine for the 1430 violation of s. 641.3154 or, if sufficient claims due a provider 1431 from a health maintenance organization do not exist to enable 1432 the take-back of an overpayment, as provided under s. 1433 641.3155(5), for the violation of s. 641.3155(5). The 1434 administrative fine for a violation cited in this paragraph 1435 shall be in the amounts specified in s. 641.52(5), and paragraph 1436 (a) does not apply. 1437 (3)âIn accordance with part II of chapter 408, the agency 1438 may impose an immediate moratorium on elective admissions to any 1439 licensed facility, building, or portion thereof, or service, 1440 when the agency determines that any condition in the licensed 1441 facility presents a threat to public health or safety. 1442 (4)âThe agency shall impose a fine of $500 for each 1443 instance of the licensed facilityâs failure to provide the 1444 information required by rules adopted pursuant to s. 1445 396.218(1)(g). 1446 Section 20.âSection 396.221, Florida Statutes, is created 1447 to read: 1448 396.221âPowers and duties of the agency.âThe agency shall: 1449 (1)âAdopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to 1450 implement this chapter and part II of chapter 408 conferring 1451 duties upon it. 1452 (2)âEnforce the special-occupancy provisions of the Florida 1453 Building Code which apply to ambulatory surgical centers in 1454 conducting any inspection authorized by this chapter and part II 1455 of chapter 408. 1456 Section 21.âSection 396.222, Florida Statutes, is created 1457 to read: 1458 396.222âPrice transparency; itemized patient statement or 1459 bill; patient admission status notification.â 1460 (1)âA facility licensed under this chapter shall provide 1461 timely and accurate financial information and quality of service 1462 measures to patients and prospective patients of the facility, 1463 or to patientsâ survivors or legal guardians, as appropriate. 1464 Such information must be provided in accordance with this 1465 section and rules adopted by the agency pursuant to this chapter 1466 and s. 408.05. 1467 (a)âEach licensed facility shall make available to the 1468 public on its website information on payments made to that 1469 facility for defined bundles of services and procedures. The 1470 payment data must be presented and searchable in accordance 1471 with, and through a hyperlink to, the system established by the 1472 agency and its vendor using the descriptive service bundles 1473 developed under s. 408.05(3)(c). At a minimum, the licensed 1474 facility shall provide the estimated average payment received 1475 from all payors, excluding Medicaid and Medicare, for the 1476 descriptive service bundles available at that facility and the 1477 estimated payment range for such bundles. Using plain language, 1478 comprehensible to an ordinary layperson, the licensed facility 1479 shall disclose that the information on average payments and the 1480 payment ranges is an estimate of costs that may be incurred by 1481 the patient or prospective patient and that actual costs will be 1482 based on the services actually provided to the patient. The 1483 licensed facilityâs website must: 1484 1.âProvide information to prospective patients on the 1485 licensed facilityâs financial assistance policy, including the 1486 application process, payment plans, and discounts, and the 1487 facilityâs charity care policy and collection procedures. 1488 2.âIf applicable, notify patients and prospective patients 1489 that services may be provided in the licensed facility by that 1490 facility as well as by other health care providers who may 1491 separately bill the patient and that such health care providers 1492 may or may not participate with the same health insurers or 1493 health maintenance organizations as the facility. 1494 3.âInform patients and prospective patients that they may 1495 request from the licensed facility and other health care 1496 providers a more personalized estimate of charges and other 1497 information, and inform patients that they should contact each 1498 health care practitioner who will provide services in the 1499 facility to determine the health insurers and health maintenance 1500 organizations with which the health care practitioner 1501 participates as a network provider or preferred provider. 1502 4.âProvide the names, mailing addresses, and telephone 1503 numbers of the health care practitioners and medical practice 1504 groups with which it contracts to provide services in the 1505 licensed facility and instructions on how to contact the 1506 practitioners and groups to determine the health insurers and 1507 health maintenance organizations with which they participate as 1508 network providers or preferred providers. 1509 (b)âEach licensed facility shall post on its website a 1510 consumer-friendly list of standard charges for at least 300 1511 shoppable health care services, or an Internet-based price 1512 estimator tool that meets federal standards. If a licensed 1513 facility provides fewer than 300 distinct shoppable health care 1514 services, it must make available on its website the standard 1515 charges for each service it provides. As used in this paragraph, 1516 the term: 1517 1.ââShoppable health care serviceâ means a service that can 1518 be scheduled by a health care consumer in advance. The term 1519 includes, but is not limited to, the services described in s. 1520 627.6387(2)(e) and any services defined in regulations or 1521 guidance issued by the United States Department of Health and 1522 Human Services. 1523 2.ââStandard chargeâ has the same meaning as that term is 1524 defined in regulations or guidance issued by the United States 1525 Department of Health and Human Services for purposes of 1526 ambulatory surgical center price transparency. 1527 (c)1.âBefore providing any nonemergency medical service, 1528 each licensed facility shall provide in writing or by electronic 1529 means a good faith estimate of reasonably anticipated charges 1530 for the treatment of a patientâs or prospective patientâs 1531 specific condition. The licensed facility is not required to 1532 adjust the estimate for any potential insurance coverage. The 1533 licensed facility must provide the estimate to the patientâs 1534 health insurer, as defined in s. 627.446(1), and the patient at 1535 least 3 business days before the date such service is to be 1536 provided, but no later than 1 business day after the date such 1537 service is scheduled or, in the case of a service scheduled at 1538 least 10 business days in advance, no later than 3 business days 1539 after the date the service is scheduled. The licensed facility 1540 shall provide the estimate to the patient no later than 3 1541 business days after the date the patient requests an estimate. 1542 The estimate may be based on the descriptive service bundles 1543 developed by the agency under s. 408.05(3)(c) unless the patient 1544 or prospective patient requests a more personalized and specific 1545 estimate that accounts for the specific condition and 1546 characteristics of the patient or prospective patient. The 1547 licensed facility shall inform the patient or prospective 1548 patient that he or she may contact his or her health insurer for 1549 additional information concerning cost-sharing responsibilities. 1550 2.âIn the estimate, the licensed facility shall provide to 1551 the patient or prospective patient information on the facilityâs 1552 financial assistance policy, including the application process, 1553 payment plans, and discounts and the facilityâs charity care 1554 policy and collection procedures. 1555 3.âThe estimate must clearly identify any facility fee and, 1556 if applicable, include a statement notifying the patient or 1557 prospective patient that a facility fee is included in the 1558 estimate, the purpose of the fee, and that the patient may pay 1559 less for the procedure or service at another facility or in 1560 another health care setting. 1561 4.âThe licensed facility shall notify the patient or 1562 prospective patient of any revision to the estimate. 1563 5.âIn the estimate, the licensed facility shall notify the 1564 patient or prospective patient that services may be provided by 1565 the facility as well as by other health care providers that may 1566 separately bill the patient, if applicable. 1567 6.âFailure to timely provide the estimate pursuant to this 1568 paragraph shall result in a daily fine of $1,000 until the 1569 estimate is provided to the patient or prospective patient and 1570 the health insurer. The total fine per patient estimate may not 1571 exceed $10,000. 1572 (d)âEach licensed facility shall make available on its 1573 website a hyperlink to the health-related data, including 1574 quality measures and statistics that are disseminated by the 1575 agency pursuant to s. 408.05. The licensed facility shall also 1576 take action to notify the public that such information is 1577 electronically available and provide a hyperlink to the agencyâs 1578 website. 1579 (e)1.âUpon request, and after the patientâs discharge or 1580 release from a licensed facility, the facility shall provide to 1581 the patient or to the patientâs survivor or legal guardian, as 1582 applicable, an itemized statement or a bill detailing in plain 1583 language, comprehensible to an ordinary layperson, the specific 1584 nature of charges or expenses incurred by the patient. The 1585 initial statement or bill must be provided within 7 days after 1586 the patientâs discharge or release or after a request for such 1587 statement or bill, whichever is later. The initial statement or 1588 bill must contain a statement of specific services received and 1589 expenses incurred by date and provider for such services, 1590 enumerating in detail as prescribed by the agency the 1591 constituent components of the services received within each 1592 department of the licensed facility and including unit price 1593 data on rates charged by the licensed facility. The statement or 1594 bill must also clearly identify any facility fee and explain the 1595 purpose of the fee. The statement or bill must identify each 1596 item as paid, pending payment by a third party, or pending 1597 payment by the patient, and must include the amount due, if 1598 applicable. If an amount is due from the patient, a due date 1599 must be included. The initial statement or bill must direct the 1600 patient or the patientâs survivor or legal guardian, as 1601 applicable, to contact the patientâs insurer or health 1602 maintenance organization regarding the patientâs cost-sharing 1603 responsibilities. 1604 2.âAny subsequent statement or bill provided to a patient 1605 or to the patientâs survivor or legal guardian, as applicable, 1606 relating to the episode of care must include all of the 1607 information required by subparagraph 1., with any revision 1608 clearly delineated. 1609 3.âEach statement or bill provided pursuant to this 1610 subsection: 1611 a.âMust include notice of physicians and other health care 1612 providers who bill separately. 1613 b.âMay not include any generalized category of expenses 1614 such as âotherâ or âmiscellaneousâ or similar categories. 1615 (2)âEach itemized statement or bill must prominently 1616 display the telephone number of the licensed facilityâs patient 1617 liaison who is responsible for expediting the resolution of any 1618 billing dispute between the patient, or the patientâs survivor 1619 or legal guardian, and the billing department. 1620 (3)âA licensed facility shall make available to a patient 1621 or his or her survivor or legal guardian all records necessary 1622 for verification of the accuracy of the patientâs statement or 1623 bill within 10 business days after the request for such records. 1624 The records must be made available in the licensed facilityâs 1625 offices and through electronic means that comply with the Health 1626 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1627 s. 1320d, as amended. Such records must be available before and 1628 after payment of the statement or bill. The licensed facility 1629 may not charge the patient or his or her survivor or legal 1630 guardian for making such verification records available; 1631 however, the facility may charge fees for providing copies of 1632 records as specified in s. 396.225(1). 1633 (4)âEach licensed facility shall establish a method for 1634 reviewing and responding to questions from patients or their 1635 survivors or legal guardians concerning the patientâs itemized 1636 statement or bill. Such response must be provided within 7 1637 business days after the date a question is received. If the 1638 patient is not satisfied with the response, the facility must 1639 provide the patient or his or her survivor or legal guardian 1640 with the contact information of the agency to which the issue 1641 may be sent for review. 1642 (5)âEach licensed facility shall establish an internal 1643 process for reviewing and responding to grievances from 1644 patients. Such process must allow a patient or his or her 1645 survivor or legal guardian to dispute charges that appear on the 1646 patientâs itemized statement or bill. The licensed facility 1647 shall prominently post on its website and indicate in bold print 1648 on each itemized statement or bill the instructions for 1649 initiating a grievance and the direct contact information 1650 required to initiate the grievance process. The licensed 1651 facility shall provide an initial response to a patient 1652 grievance within 7 business days after the patient or his or her 1653 survivor or legal guardian formally files a grievance disputing 1654 all or a portion of an itemized statement or bill. 1655 (6)âEach licensed facility shall disclose to a patient, a 1656 prospective patient, or a patientâs legal guardian whether a 1657 cost-sharing obligation for a particular covered health care 1658 service or item exceeds the charge that applies to an individual 1659 who pays cash or the cash equivalent for the same health care 1660 service or item in the absence of health insurance coverage. 1661 Failure to provide a disclosure in compliance with this 1662 subsection may result in a fine not to exceed $500 per incident. 1663 Section 22.âSection 396.223, Florida Statutes, is created 1664 to read: 1665 396.223âBilling and collection activities.â 1666 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âextraordinary 1667 collection actionâ means any of the following actions taken by a 1668 licensed facility against an individual in relation to obtaining 1669 payment of a bill for care: 1670 (a)âSelling the individualâs debt to another party. 1671 (b)âReporting adverse information about the individual to 1672 consumer credit reporting agencies or credit bureaus. 1673 (c)âActions that require a legal or judicial process, 1674 including, but not limited to: 1675 1.âPlacing a lien on the individualâs property; 1676 2.âForeclosing on the individualâs real property; 1677 3.âAttaching or seizing the individualâs bank account or 1678 any other personal property; 1679 4.âCommencing a civil action against the individual; 1680 5.âCausing the individualâs arrest; or 1681 6.âGarnishing the individualâs wages. 1682 (2)âA licensed facility may not engage in an extraordinary 1683 collection action against an individual to obtain payment for 1684 services: 1685 (a)âBefore the licensed facility has made reasonable 1686 efforts to determine whether the individual is eligible for 1687 assistance under its financial assistance policy for the care 1688 provided and, if eligible, before a decision is made by the 1689 facility on the patientâs application for such financial 1690 assistance. 1691 (b)âBefore the licensed facility has provided the 1692 individual with an itemized statement or bill. 1693 (c)âDuring an ongoing grievance process as described in s. 1694 395.301(6) or an ongoing appeal of a claim adjudication. 1695 (d)âBefore billing any applicable insurer and allowing the 1696 insurer to adjudicate a claim. 1697 (e)âFor 30 days after notifying the patient in writing, by 1698 certified mail or by other traceable delivery method, that a 1699 collection action will commence absent additional action by the 1700 patient. This paragraph does not apply to a sale of debt 1701 governed by a contract executed by the facility which provides 1702 that the debt may not incur interest or fees and that no other 1703 extraordinary collection actions may be taken by the purchaser 1704 of the debt which could otherwise be taken by the licensed 1705 facility, as described in subsection (1), and that the debt will 1706 be returned to the facility if the debt buyer determines the 1707 individual is eligible for assistance under the facilityâs 1708 financial assistance policy. 1709 (f)âWhile the individual: 1710 1.âNegotiates in good faith the final amount of a bill for 1711 services rendered; or 1712 2.âComplies with all terms of a payment plan with the 1713 licensed facility. 1714 Section 23.âSection 396.224, Florida Statutes, is created 1715 to read: 1716 396.224âPatient records; penalties for alteration.â 1717 (1)âA person who fraudulently alters, defaces, or falsifies 1718 any medical record, or causes or procures any of these offenses 1719 to be committed, commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 1720 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1721 (2)âA conviction under subsection (1) is also grounds for 1722 restriction, suspension, or termination of a license. 1723 Section 24.âSection 396.225, Florida Statutes, is created 1724 to read: 1725 396.225âPatient and personnel records; copies; 1726 examination.â 1727 (1)âA licensed facility shall, upon written request, and 1728 only after discharge of the patient, furnish, in a timely 1729 manner, without delays for legal review, to any person admitted 1730 to the licensed facility for care and treatment or treated at 1731 the licensed facility, or to any such personâs guardian, 1732 curator, or personal representative, or in the absence of one of 1733 those persons, to the next of kin of a decedent or the parent of 1734 a minor, or to anyone designated by such person in writing, a 1735 true and correct copy of all patient records, including X rays, 1736 and insurance information concerning such person, which records 1737 are in the possession of the licensed facility, provided that 1738 the person requesting such records agrees to pay a charge. The 1739 exclusive charge for copies of patient records may include sales 1740 tax and actual postage, and, except for nonpaper records that 1741 are subject to a charge not to exceed $2, may not exceed $1 per 1742 page. A fee of up to $1 may be charged for each year of records 1743 requested. These charges apply to all records furnished, whether 1744 directly from the licensed facility or from a copy service 1745 providing these services on behalf of the licensed facility. 1746 However, a patient whose records are copied or searched for the 1747 purpose of continuing to receive medical care is not required to 1748 pay a charge for copying or for the search. The licensed 1749 facility shall further allow any such person to examine the 1750 original records in its possession, or microforms or other 1751 suitable reproductions of the records, upon such reasonable 1752 terms as must be imposed to ensure that the records will not be 1753 damaged, destroyed, or altered. 1754 (2)âPatient records are confidential and may not be 1755 disclosed without the consent of the patient or his or her legal 1756 representative, but appropriate disclosure may be made without 1757 such consent to: 1758 (a)âLicensed facility personnel, attending physicians, or 1759 other health care practitioners and providers currently involved 1760 in the care or treatment of the patient for use only in 1761 connection with the treatment of the patient. 1762 (b)âLicensed facility personnel only for administrative 1763 purposes or risk management and quality assurance functions. 1764 (c)âThe agency, for purposes of health care cost 1765 containment. 1766 (d)âIn any civil or criminal action, unless otherwise 1767 prohibited by law, upon the issuance of a subpoena from a court 1768 of competent jurisdiction and proper notice by the party seeking 1769 such records to the patient or his or her legal representative. 1770 (e)âThe department upon a subpoena issued pursuant to s. 1771 456.071, but the records obtained must be used solely for the 1772 purpose of the department and the appropriate regulatory board 1773 in its investigation, prosecution, and appeal of disciplinary 1774 proceedings. If the department requests copies of the records, 1775 the licensed facility must charge no more than its actual 1776 copying costs, including reasonable staff time. The records must 1777 be sealed and must not be available to the public pursuant to s. 1778 119.07(1) or any other statute providing access to records, nor 1779 may they be available to the public as part of the record of 1780 investigation for and prosecution in disciplinary proceedings 1781 made available to the public by the department or the 1782 appropriate regulatory board. However, the department shall make 1783 available, upon written request by a health care practitioner 1784 against whom probable cause has been found, any such record that 1785 forms the basis of the determination of probable cause. 1786 (f)âThe Medicaid Fraud Control Unit in the Department of 1787 Legal Affairs pursuant to s. 409.920. 1788 (g)âThe Department of Financial Services, or an agent, 1789 employee, or independent contractor of the department who is 1790 auditing for unclaimed property pursuant to chapter 717. 1791 (h)âIf applicable to a licensed facility, a regional poison 1792 control center for purposes of treating a poison episode under 1793 evaluation, case management of poison cases, or compliance with 1794 data collection and reporting requirements of s. 395.1027 and 1795 the professional organization that certifies poison control 1796 centers in accordance with federal law. 1797 (i)âThe Department of Children and Families, its agent, or 1798 its contracted entity, for the purposes of investigations of or 1799 services for cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of 1800 children or vulnerable adults. 1801 (j)âOrgan procurement organizations, tissue banks, and eye 1802 banks required to conduct death records reviews pursuant to s. 1803 395.2050. 1804 (3)âThe Department of Health may examine patient records of 1805 a licensed facility, whether held by the licensed facility or 1806 the agency, for the purpose of epidemiological investigations. 1807 The unauthorized release of information by agents of the 1808 department which would identify an individual patient is a 1809 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1810 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1811 (4)âPatient records must contain information required for 1812 completion of birth, death, and fetal death certificates. 1813 (5)(a)âIf the content of any record of patient treatment is 1814 provided under this section, the recipient, if other than the 1815 patient or the patientâs representative, may use such 1816 information only for the purpose provided and may not further 1817 disclose any information to any other person or entity, unless 1818 expressly permitted by the written consent of the patient. A 1819 general authorization for the release of medical information is 1820 not sufficient for this purpose. The content of such patient 1821 treatment record is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 1822 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 1823 (b)âAbsent a specific written release or authorization 1824 permitting utilization of patient information for solicitation 1825 or marketing the sale of goods or services, any use of patient 1826 information for those purposes is prohibited. 1827 (6)âA licensed facility may prescribe the content and 1828 custody of limited-access records that the facility may maintain 1829 on its employees. Such records are limited to information 1830 regarding evaluations of employee performance, including records 1831 forming the basis for evaluation and subsequent actions, and 1832 must be open to inspection only by the employee and by officials 1833 of the licensed facility who are responsible for the supervision 1834 of the employee. The custodian of limited-access employee 1835 records shall release information from such records to other 1836 employers or only upon authorization in writing from the 1837 employee or upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Any 1838 licensed facility releasing such records pursuant to this 1839 chapter is considered to be acting in good faith and may not be 1840 held liable for information contained in such records, absent a 1841 showing that the facility maliciously falsified such records. 1842 Such limited-access employee records are exempt from s. 1843 119.07(1) for a period of 5 years from the date such records are 1844 designated limited-access records. 1845 (7)âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and photographs 1846 of employees of any licensed facility who provide direct patient 1847 care or security services; the home addresses, telephone 1848 numbers, and places of employment of the spouses and children of 1849 such persons; and the names and locations of schools and day 1850 care facilities attended by the children of such persons are 1851 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 1852 of the State Constitution. However, any state or federal agency 1853 that is authorized to have access to such information by any 1854 provision of law shall be granted such access in the furtherance 1855 of its statutory duties, notwithstanding this subsection. The 1856 Department of Financial Services, or an agent, employee, or 1857 independent contractor of the department who is auditing for 1858 unclaimed property pursuant to chapter 717, shall be granted 1859 access to the name, address, and social security number of any 1860 employee owed unclaimed property. 1861 (8)âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and photographs 1862 of employees of any licensed facility who have a reasonable 1863 belief, based upon specific circumstances that have been 1864 reported in accordance with the procedure adopted by the 1865 licensed facility, that release of the information may be used 1866 to threaten, intimidate, harass, inflict violence upon, or 1867 defraud the employee or any member of the employeeâs family; the 1868 home addresses, telephone numbers, and places of employment of 1869 the spouses and children of such persons; and the names and 1870 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 1871 children of such persons are confidential and exempt from s. 1872 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 1873 However, any state or federal agency that is authorized to have 1874 access to such information by any provision of law shall be 1875 granted such access in the furtherance of its statutory duties, 1876 notwithstanding this subsection. The licensed facility shall 1877 maintain the confidentiality of the personal information only if 1878 the employee submits a written request for confidentiality to 1879 the licensed facility. 1880 Section 25.âSubsection (3) of section 39.304, Florida 1881 Statutes, is amended to read: 1882 39.304âPhotographs, medical examinations, X rays, and 1883 medical treatment of abused, abandoned, or neglected child.â 1884 (3)âAny facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396 1885 shall provide to the department, its agent, or a Child 1886 Protection Team that contracts with the department any 1887 photograph or report on examinations made or X rays taken 1888 pursuant to this section, or copies thereof, for the purpose of 1889 investigation or assessment of cases of abuse, abandonment, 1890 neglect, or exploitation of children. 1891 Section 26.âSubsection (4) of section 95.11, Florida 1892 Statutes, is amended to read: 1893 95.11âLimitations other than for the recovery of real 1894 property.âActions other than for recovery of real property shall 1895 be commenced as follows: 1896 (4)âWITHIN THREE YEARS.âAn action to collect medical debt 1897 for services rendered by a facility licensed under chapter 395 1898 or chapter 396, provided that the period of limitations shall 1899 run from the date on which the facility refers the medical debt 1900 to a third party for collection. 1901 Section 27.âSection 222.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1902 read: 1903 222.26âAdditional exemptions from legal process concerning 1904 medical debt.âIf a debt is owed for medical services provided by 1905 a facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396, the 1906 following property is exempt from attachment, garnishment, or 1907 other legal process in an action on such debt: 1908 (1)âA debtorâs interest, not to exceed $10,000 in value, in 1909 a single motor vehicle as defined in s. 320.01(1). 1910 (2)âA debtorâs interest in personal property, not to exceed 1911 $10,000 in value, if the debtor does not claim or receive the 1912 benefits of a homestead exemption under s. 4, Art. X of the 1913 State Constitution. 1914 Section 28.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 1915 381.00316, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1916 381.00316âDiscrimination by governmental and business 1917 entities based on health care choices; prohibition.â 1918 (3) 1919 (d)âA hospital licensed under chapter 395 or an ambulatory 1920 surgical center licensed under chapter 396 licensed facility as 1921 defined in s. 395.002 may not discriminate in providing health 1922 care to a patient based solely on that patientâs vaccination 1923 status with a COVID-19 vaccine. 1924 Section 29.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 381.0035, 1925 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1926 381.0035âEducational course on HIV and AIDS; employees and 1927 clients of certain health care facilities.â 1928 (1)âThe Department of Health shall require all employees 1929 and clients of facilities licensed under chapter 393, chapter 1930 394, or chapter 397 and employees of facilities licensed under 1931 chapter 395 or chapter 396, part II, part III, or part IV of 1932 chapter 400, or part I of chapter 429 to complete a one-time 1933 educational course on the modes of transmission, infection 1934 control procedures, clinical management, and prevention of human 1935 immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency syndrome 1936 with an emphasis on appropriate behavior and attitude change. 1937 Such instruction shall include information on current Florida 1938 law and its impact on testing, confidentiality of test results, 1939 and treatment of patients and any protocols and procedures 1940 applicable to human immunodeficiency counseling and testing, 1941 reporting, the offering of HIV testing to pregnant women, and 1942 partner notification issues pursuant to ss. 381.004 and 384.25. 1943 An employee who has completed the educational course required in 1944 this subsection is not required to repeat the course upon 1945 changing employment to a different facility licensed under 1946 chapter 393, chapter 394, chapter 395, chapter 396, chapter 397, 1947 part II, part III, or part IV of chapter 400, or part I of 1948 chapter 429. 1949 (2)âFacilities licensed under chapter 393, chapter 394, 1950 chapter 395, chapter 396, or chapter 397, part II, part III, or 1951 part IV of chapter 400, or part I of chapter 429 shall maintain 1952 a record of employees and dates of attendance at human 1953 immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency syndrome 1954 educational courses. 1955 Section 30.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection 1956 (6) of section 381.026, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1957 381.026âFlorida Patientâs Bill of Rights and 1958 Responsibilities.â 1959 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section and s. 381.0261, 1960 the term: 1961 (b)ââHealth care facilityâ means a facility licensed under 1962 chapter 395 or chapter 396. 1963 (6)âSUMMARY OF RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES.âAny health care 1964 provider who treats a patient in an office or any health care 1965 facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396 that provides 1966 emergency services and care or outpatient services and care to a 1967 patient, or admits and treats a patient, shall adopt and make 1968 available to the patient, in writing, a statement of the rights 1969 and responsibilities of patients, including the following: 1970 1971 SUMMARY OF THE FLORIDA PATIENTâS BILL 1972 OF RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES 1973 1974 Florida law requires that your health care provider or 1975 health care facility recognize your rights while you are 1976 receiving medical care and that you respect the health care 1977 providerâs or health care facilityâs right to expect certain 1978 behavior on the part of patients. You may request a copy of the 1979 full text of this law from your health care provider or health 1980 care facility. A summary of your rights and responsibilities 1981 follows: 1982 A patient has the right to be treated with courtesy and 1983 respect, with appreciation of his or her individual dignity, and 1984 with protection of his or her need for privacy. 1985 A patient has the right to a prompt and reasonable response 1986 to questions and requests. 1987 A patient has the right to know who is providing medical 1988 services and who is responsible for his or her care. 1989 A patient has the right to know what patient support 1990 services are available, including whether an interpreter is 1991 available if he or she does not speak English. 1992 A patient has the right to bring any person of his or her 1993 choosing to the patient-accessible areas of the health care 1994 facility or providerâs office to accompany the patient while the 1995 patient is receiving inpatient or outpatient treatment or is 1996 consulting with his or her health care provider, unless doing so 1997 would risk the safety or health of the patient, other patients, 1998 or staff of the facility or office or cannot be reasonably 1999 accommodated by the facility or provider. 2000 A patient has the right to know what rules and regulations 2001 apply to his or her conduct. 2002 A patient has the right to be given by the health care 2003 provider information concerning diagnosis, planned course of 2004 treatment, alternatives, risks, and prognosis. 2005 A patient has the right to refuse any treatment, except as 2006 otherwise provided by law. 2007 A patient has the right to be given, upon request, full 2008 information and necessary counseling on the availability of 2009 known financial resources for his or her care. 2010 A patient who is eligible for Medicare has the right to 2011 know, upon request and in advance of treatment, whether the 2012 health care provider or health care facility accepts the 2013 Medicare assignment rate. 2014 A patient has the right to receive, upon request, prior to 2015 treatment, a reasonable estimate of charges for medical care. 2016 A patient has the right to receive a copy of a reasonably 2017 clear and understandable, itemized bill and, upon request, to 2018 have the charges explained. 2019 A patient has the right to impartial access to medical 2020 treatment or accommodations, regardless of race, national 2021 origin, religion, handicap, or source of payment. 2022 A patient has the right to treatment for any emergency 2023 medical condition that will deteriorate from failure to provide 2024 treatment. 2025 A patient has the right to know if medical treatment is for 2026 purposes of experimental research and to give his or her consent 2027 or refusal to participate in such experimental research. 2028 A patient has the right to express grievances regarding any 2029 violation of his or her rights, as stated in Florida law, 2030 through the grievance procedure of the health care provider or 2031 health care facility which served him or her and to the 2032 appropriate state licensing agency. 2033 A patient is responsible for providing to the health care 2034 provider, to the best of his or her knowledge, accurate and 2035 complete information about present complaints, past illnesses, 2036 hospitalizations, medications, and other matters relating to his 2037 or her health. 2038 A patient is responsible for reporting unexpected changes 2039 in his or her condition to the health care provider. 2040 A patient is responsible for reporting to the health care 2041 provider whether he or she comprehends a contemplated course of 2042 action and what is expected of him or her. 2043 A patient is responsible for following the treatment plan 2044 recommended by the health care provider. 2045 A patient is responsible for keeping appointments and, when 2046 he or she is unable to do so for any reason, for notifying the 2047 health care provider or health care facility. 2048 A patient is responsible for his or her actions if he or 2049 she refuses treatment or does not follow the health care 2050 providerâs instructions. 2051 A patient is responsible for assuring that the financial 2052 obligations of his or her health care are fulfilled as promptly 2053 as possible. 2054 A patient is responsible for following health care facility 2055 rules and regulations affecting patient care and conduct. 2056 Section 31.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3), paragraph (a) 2057 of subsection (6), and paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of 2058 section 381.028, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2059 381.028âAdverse medical incidents.â 2060 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in s. 25, Art. X of the State 2061 Constitution and this act, the term: 2062 (f)ââHealth care facilityâ means a facility licensed under 2063 chapter 395 or chapter 396. 2064 (6)âUSE OF RECORDS.â 2065 (a)âThis section does not repeal or otherwise alter any 2066 existing restrictions on the discoverability or admissibility of 2067 records relating to adverse medical incidents otherwise provided 2068 by law, including, but not limited to, those contained in ss. 2069 395.0191, 395.0193, 395.0197, 396.211, 396.212, 396.213, 2070 766.101, and 766.1016, or repeal or otherwise alter any immunity 2071 provided to, or prohibition against compelling testimony by, 2072 persons providing information or participating in any peer 2073 review panel, medical review committee, hospital committee, or 2074 other hospital board otherwise provided by law, including, but 2075 not limited to, ss. 395.0191, 395.0193, 396.211, 396.212, 2076 766.101, and 766.1016. 2077 (7)âPRODUCTION OF RECORDS.â 2078 (b)1.âUsing the process provided in s. 395.0197 or s. 2079 396.213, as applicable, the health care facility shall be 2080 responsible for identifying records as records of an adverse 2081 medical incident, as defined in s. 25, Art. X of the State 2082 Constitution. 2083 2.âUsing the process provided in s. 458.351, the health 2084 care provider shall be responsible for identifying records as 2085 records of an adverse medical incident, as defined in s. 25, 2086 Art. X of the State Constitution, occurring in an office 2087 setting. 2088 Section 32.âParagraph (b) of subsection (9) and paragraph 2089 (d) of subsection (12) of section 381.915, Florida Statutes, is 2090 amended to read: 2091 381.915âCasey DeSantis Cancer Research Program.â 2092 (9) 2093 (b)âTo be eligible for grant funding under this subsection, 2094 a licensed or certified health care provider, facility, or 2095 entity must meet at least one of the following criteria: 2096 1.âOperates as a licensed hospital that has a minimum of 30 2097 percent of its current cancer patients residing in rural or 2098 underserved areas. 2099 2.âOperates as a licensed health care clinic or facility 2100 that employs or contracts with at least one physician licensed 2101 under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who is board certified in 2102 oncology and that administers chemotherapy treatments for 2103 cancer. 2104 3.âOperates as a licensed facility that employs or 2105 contracts with at least one physician licensed under chapter 458 2106 or chapter 459 who is board certified in oncology and that 2107 administers radiation therapy treatments for cancer. 2108 4.âOperates as a licensed health care clinic or facility 2109 that provides cancer screening services at no cost or a minimal 2110 cost to patients. 2111 5.âOperates as a rural hospital as defined in s. 2112 395.602(2)(b). 2113 6.âOperates as a critical access hospital as defined in s. 2114 408.07(14). 2115 7.âOperates as a specialty hospital as defined in s. 2116 395.002(27)(a) s. 395.002(28)(a) which provides cancer treatment 2117 for patients from birth to 18 years of age. 2118 8.âOperates as a licensed hospital that is accredited by 2119 the American College of Surgeons as a Comprehensive Community 2120 Cancer Program or Integrated Network Cancer Program. 2121 9.âEngages in biomedical research intended to develop 2122 therapies, medical pharmaceuticals, treatment protocols, or 2123 medical procedures intended to cure cancer or improve the 2124 quality of life of cancer patients. 2125 10.âEducates or trains students, postdoctoral fellows, or 2126 licensed or certified health care practitioners in the 2127 screening, diagnosis, or treatment of cancer. 2128 (12) 2129 (d)âApplications for incubator funding may be submitted by 2130 any Florida-based specialty hospital as defined in s. 2131 395.002(27)(a) s. 395.002(28)(a) which provides cancer treatment 2132 for patients from birth to 18 years of age. All qualified 2133 applicants must have equal access and opportunity to compete for 2134 research funding. Incubator grants must be recommended by the 2135 collaborative and awarded by the department on the basis of 2136 scientific merit, as determined by a competitively open and 2137 peer-reviewed process to ensure objectivity, consistency, and 2138 high quality. 2139 Section 33.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 2140 383.145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2141 383.145âNewborn, infant, and toddler hearing screening.â 2142 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 2143 (d)ââHospitalâ means a facility as defined in s. 395.002 s. 2144 395.002(13) and licensed under chapter 395 and part II of 2145 chapter 408. 2146 Section 34.âSubsection (1) of section 385.202, Florida 2147 Statutes, is amended to read: 2148 385.202âStatewide cancer registry.â 2149 (1)âEach facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396 2150 and each freestanding radiation therapy center as defined in s. 2151 408.07 shall report to the Department of Health such 2152 information, specified by the department, by rule, which 2153 indicates diagnosis, stage of disease, medical history, 2154 laboratory data, tissue diagnosis, and radiation, surgical, or 2155 other methods of diagnosis or treatment for each cancer 2156 diagnosed or treated by the facility or center. Failure to 2157 comply with this requirement may be cause for registration or 2158 licensure suspension or revocation. 2159 Section 35.âSubsection (2) of section 385.211, Florida 2160 Statutes, is amended to read: 2161 385.211âRefractory and intractable epilepsy treatment and 2162 research at recognized medical centers.â 2163 (2)âNotwithstanding chapter 893, medical centers recognized 2164 pursuant to s. 381.925, or an academic medical research 2165 institution legally affiliated with a licensed childrenâs 2166 specialty hospital as defined in s. 395.002 which s. 395.002(28) 2167 that contracts with the Department of Health, may conduct 2168 research on cannabidiol and low-THC cannabis. This research may 2169 include, but is not limited to, the agricultural development, 2170 production, clinical research, and use of liquid medical 2171 derivatives of cannabidiol and low-THC cannabis for the 2172 treatment for refractory or intractable epilepsy. The authority 2173 for recognized medical centers to conduct this research is 2174 derived from 21 C.F.R. parts 312 and 316. Current state or 2175 privately obtained research funds may be used to support the 2176 activities described in this section. 2177 Section 36.âSubsection (8) of section 390.011, Florida 2178 Statutes, is amended to read: 2179 390.011âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 2180 (8)ââHospitalâ means a facility as defined in s. 395.002 s. 2181 395.002(12) and licensed under chapter 395 and part II of 2182 chapter 408. 2183 Section 37.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (4) of 2184 section 390.025, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2185 390.025âAbortion referral or counseling agencies; 2186 penalties.â 2187 (4)âThe following are exempt from the requirement to 2188 register pursuant to subsection (3): 2189 (a)âFacilities licensed pursuant to this chapter, chapter 2190 395, chapter 396, chapter 400, or chapter 408; 2191 (c)âHealth care practitioners, as defined in s. 456.001, 2192 who, in the course of their practice outside of a facility 2193 licensed pursuant to this chapter, chapter 395, chapter 396, 2194 chapter 400, or chapter 408, refer five or fewer patients for 2195 abortions each month. 2196 Section 38.âSubsection (7) of section 394.4787, Florida 2197 Statutes, is amended to read: 2198 394.4787âDefinitions; ss. 394.4786, 394.4787, 394.4788, and 2199 394.4789.âAs used in this section and ss. 394.4786, 394.4788, 2200 and 394.4789: 2201 (7)ââSpecialty psychiatric hospitalâ means a hospital 2202 licensed by the agency pursuant to s. 395.002 s. 395.002(28) and 2203 part II of chapter 408 as a specialty psychiatric hospital. 2204 Section 39.âSection 395.001, Florida Statutes, is amended 2205 to read: 2206 395.001âLegislative intent.âIt is the intent of the 2207 Legislature to provide for the protection of public health and 2208 safety in the establishment, construction, maintenance, and 2209 operation of hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers by 2210 providing for licensure of same and for the development, 2211 establishment, and enforcement of minimum standards with respect 2212 thereto. 2213 Section 40.âSubsections (3), (10), (17), (23), and (28) of 2214 section 395.002, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2215 395.002âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 2216 (3)ââAmbulatory surgical centerâ means a facility, the 2217 primary purpose of which is to provide elective surgical care, 2218 in which the patient is admitted to and discharged from such 2219 facility within 24 hours, and which is not part of a hospital. 2220 However, a facility existing for the primary purpose of 2221 performing terminations of pregnancy, an office maintained by a 2222 physician for the practice of medicine, or an office maintained 2223 for the practice of dentistry may not be construed to be an 2224 ambulatory surgical center, provided that any facility or office 2225 which is certified or seeks certification as a Medicare 2226 ambulatory surgical center shall be licensed as an ambulatory 2227 surgical center pursuant to s. 395.003. 2228 (9)(10)ââGeneral hospitalâ means any facility which meets 2229 the provisions of subsection (11) (12) and which regularly makes 2230 its facilities and services available to the general population. 2231 (16)(17)ââLicensed facilityâ means a hospital or ambulatory 2232 surgical center licensed in accordance with this chapter. 2233 (22)(23)ââPremisesâ means those buildings, beds, and 2234 equipment located at the address of the licensed facility and 2235 all other buildings, beds, and equipment for the provision of 2236 hospital or ambulatory surgical care located in such reasonable 2237 proximity to the address of the licensed facility as to appear 2238 to the public to be under the dominion and control of the 2239 licensee. For any licensee that is a teaching hospital as 2240 defined in s. 408.07, reasonable proximity includes any 2241 buildings, beds, services, programs, and equipment under the 2242 dominion and control of the licensee that are located at a site 2243 with a main address that is within 1 mile of the main address of 2244 the licensed facility; and all such buildings, beds, and 2245 equipment may, at the request of a licensee or applicant, be 2246 included on the facility license as a single premises. 2247 (27)(28)ââSpecialty hospitalâ means any facility which 2248 meets the provisions of subsection (11) (12), and which 2249 regularly makes available either: 2250 (a)âThe range of medical services offered by general 2251 hospitals but restricted to a defined age or gender group of the 2252 population; 2253 (b)âA restricted range of services appropriate to the 2254 diagnosis, care, and treatment of patients with specific 2255 categories of medical or psychiatric illnesses or disorders; or 2256 (c)âIntensive residential treatment programs for children 2257 and adolescents as defined in subsection (15) (16). 2258 Section 41.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (d) of subsection 2259 (5) of section 395.003, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2260 395.003âLicensure; denial, suspension, and revocation.â 2261 (1)(a)âThe requirements of part II of chapter 408 apply to 2262 the provision of services that require licensure pursuant to ss. 2263 395.001-395.1065 and part II of chapter 408 and to entities 2264 licensed by or applying for such licensure from the Agency for 2265 Health Care Administration pursuant to ss. 395.001-395.1065. A 2266 license issued by the agency is required in order to operate a 2267 hospital or ambulatory surgical center in this state. 2268 (b)1.âIt is unlawful for a person to use or advertise to 2269 the public, in any way or by any medium whatsoever, any facility 2270 as a âhospitalâ or âambulatory surgical centerâ unless such 2271 facility has first secured a license under this chapter part. 2272 2.âThis part does not apply to veterinary hospitals or to 2273 commercial business establishments using the word âhospitalâ or 2274 âambulatory surgical centerâ as a part of a trade name if no 2275 treatment of human beings is performed on the premises of such 2276 establishments. 2277 (5) 2278 (d)âA hospital, an ambulatory surgical center, a specialty 2279 hospital, or an urgent care center shall comply with ss. 2280 627.64194 and 641.513 as a condition of licensure. 2281 Section 42.âSubsections (2), (3), and (9) of section 2282 395.1055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2283 395.1055âRules and enforcement.â 2284 (2)âSeparate standards may be provided for general and 2285 specialty hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and statutory 2286 rural hospitals as defined in s. 395.602. 2287 (3)âThe agency shall adopt rules that establish minimum 2288 standards for pediatric patient care in ambulatory surgical 2289 centers to ensure the safe and effective delivery of surgical 2290 care to children in ambulatory surgical centers. Such standards 2291 must include quality of care, nurse staffing, physician 2292 staffing, and equipment standards. Ambulatory surgical centers 2293 may not provide operative procedures to children under 18 years 2294 of age which require a length of stay past midnight until such 2295 standards are established by rule. 2296 (8)(9)âThe agency may not adopt any rule governing the 2297 design, construction, erection, alteration, modification, 2298 repair, or demolition of any public or private hospital or, 2299 intermediate residential treatment facility, or ambulatory 2300 surgical center. It is the intent of the Legislature to preempt 2301 that function to the Florida Building Commission and the State 2302 Fire Marshal through adoption and maintenance of the Florida 2303 Building Code and the Florida Fire Prevention Code. However, the 2304 agency shall provide technical assistance to the commission and 2305 the State Fire Marshal in updating the construction standards of 2306 the Florida Building Code and the Florida Fire Prevention Code 2307 which govern hospitals and, intermediate residential treatment 2308 facilities, and ambulatory surgical centers. 2309 Section 43.âSubsection (3) of section 395.10973, Florida 2310 Statutes, is amended to read: 2311 395.10973âPowers and duties of the agency.âIt is the 2312 function of the agency to: 2313 (3)âEnforce the special-occupancy provisions of the Florida 2314 Building Code which apply to hospitals and, intermediate 2315 residential treatment facilities, and ambulatory surgical 2316 centers in conducting any inspection authorized by this chapter 2317 and part II of chapter 408. 2318 Section 44.âSubsection (8) of section 395.3025, Florida 2319 Statutes, is amended to read: 2320 395.3025âPatient and personnel records; copies; 2321 examination.â 2322 (8)âPatient records at hospitals and ambulatory surgical 2323 centers are exempt from disclosure under s. 119.07(1), except as 2324 provided by subsections (1)-(5). 2325 Section 45.âSubsection (3) of section 395.607, Florida 2326 Statutes, is amended to read: 2327 395.607âRural emergency hospitals.â 2328 (3)âNotwithstanding s. 395.002 s. 395.002(12), a rural 2329 emergency hospital is not required to offer acute inpatient care 2330 or care beyond 24 hours, or to make available treatment 2331 facilities for surgery, obstetrical care, or similar services in 2332 order to be deemed a hospital as long as it maintains its 2333 designation as a rural emergency hospital, and may be required 2334 to make such services available only if it ceases to be 2335 designated as a rural emergency hospital. 2336 Section 46.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 2337 395.701, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2338 395.701âAnnual assessments on net operating revenues for 2339 inpatient and outpatient services to fund public medical 2340 assistance; administrative fines for failure to pay assessments 2341 when due; exemption.â 2342 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 2343 (c)ââHospitalâ means a health care institution as defined 2344 in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(12), but does not include any hospital 2345 operated by a state agency. 2346 Section 47.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 2347 400.518, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2348 400.518âProhibited referrals to home health agencies.â 2349 (3) 2350 (b)âA physician who violates this section is subject to 2351 disciplinary action by the appropriate board under s. 458.331(2) 2352 or s. 459.015(2). A hospital or ambulatory surgical center that 2353 violates this section is subject to s. 395.0185(2). An 2354 ambulatory surgical center that violates this section is subject 2355 to s. 396.209. 2356 Section 48.âParagraph (h) of subsection (5) of section 2357 400.93, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2358 400.93âLicensure required; exemptions; unlawful acts; 2359 penalties.â 2360 (5)âThe following are exempt from home medical equipment 2361 provider licensure, unless they have a separate company, 2362 corporation, or division that is in the business of providing 2363 home medical equipment and services for sale or rent to 2364 consumers at their regular or temporary place of residence 2365 pursuant to the provisions of this part: 2366 (h)âHospitals licensed under chapter 395 and ambulatory 2367 surgical centers licensed under chapter 396 395. 2368 Section 49.âParagraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (4) of 2369 section 400.9905, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2370 400.9905âDefinitions.â 2371 (4)ââClinicâ means an entity where health care services are 2372 provided to individuals and which tenders charges for 2373 reimbursement for such services, including a mobile clinic and a 2374 portable equipment provider. As used in this part, the term does 2375 not include and the licensure requirements of this part do not 2376 apply to: 2377 (a)âEntities licensed or registered by the state under 2378 chapter 395 or chapter 396; entities licensed or registered by 2379 the state and providing only health care services within the 2380 scope of services authorized under their respective licenses 2381 under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, 2382 this chapter except part X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 2383 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end 2384 stage renal disease providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 2385 494; providers certified and providing only health care services 2386 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 2387 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H, 2388 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care 2389 services within the scope of services authorized under their 2390 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; 2391 providers certified and providing only health care services 2392 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 2393 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 2394 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 2395 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 2396 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 2397 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 2398 services or other health care services by licensed practitioners 2399 solely within a hospital licensed under chapter 395. 2400 (b)âEntities that own, directly or indirectly, entities 2401 licensed or registered by the state pursuant to chapter 395 or 2402 chapter 396; entities that own, directly or indirectly, entities 2403 licensed or registered by the state and providing only health 2404 care services within the scope of services authorized pursuant 2405 to their respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 2406 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, 2407 chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, 2408 chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers 2409 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and 2410 providing only health care services within the scope of services 2411 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. 2412 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers 2413 certified and providing only health care services within the 2414 scope of services authorized under their respective 2415 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers 2416 certified and providing only health care services within the 2417 scope of services authorized under their respective 2418 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 2419 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 2420 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 2421 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 2422 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 2423 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 2424 licensed under chapter 395. 2425 (c)âEntities that are owned, directly or indirectly, by an 2426 entity licensed or registered by the state pursuant to chapter 2427 395 or chapter 396; entities that are owned, directly or 2428 indirectly, by an entity licensed or registered by the state and 2429 providing only health care services within the scope of services 2430 authorized pursuant to their respective licenses under ss. 2431 383.30-383.332, chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this 2432 chapter except part X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, 2433 chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage 2434 renal disease providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; 2435 providers certified and providing only health care services 2436 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 2437 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H, 2438 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care 2439 services within the scope of services authorized under their 2440 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; 2441 providers certified and providing only health care services 2442 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 2443 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 2444 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 2445 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 2446 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 2447 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 2448 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 2449 under chapter 395. 2450 (d)âEntities that are under common ownership, directly or 2451 indirectly, with an entity licensed or registered by the state 2452 pursuant to chapter 395 or chapter 396; entities that are under 2453 common ownership, directly or indirectly, with an entity 2454 licensed or registered by the state and providing only health 2455 care services within the scope of services authorized pursuant 2456 to their respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 2457 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, 2458 chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, 2459 chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers 2460 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and 2461 providing only health care services within the scope of services 2462 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. 2463 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers 2464 certified and providing only health care services within the 2465 scope of services authorized under their respective 2466 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers 2467 certified and providing only health care services within the 2468 scope of services authorized under their respective 2469 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 2470 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 2471 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 2472 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 2473 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 2474 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 2475 licensed under chapter 395. 2476 2477 Notwithstanding this subsection, an entity shall be deemed a 2478 clinic and must be licensed under this part in order to receive 2479 reimbursement under the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law, ss. 2480 627.730-627.7405, unless exempted under s. 627.736(5)(h). 2481 Section 50.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 2482 400.9935, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2483 400.9935âClinic responsibilities.â 2484 (1)âEach clinic shall appoint a medical director or clinic 2485 director who shall agree in writing to accept legal 2486 responsibility for the following activities on behalf of the 2487 clinic. The medical director or the clinic director shall: 2488 (i)âEnsure that the clinic publishes a schedule of charges 2489 for the medical services offered to patients. The schedule must 2490 include the prices charged to an uninsured person paying for 2491 such services by cash, check, credit card, or debit card. The 2492 schedule may group services by price levels, listing services in 2493 each price level. The schedule must be posted in a conspicuous 2494 place in the reception area of any clinic that is considered an 2495 urgent care center as defined in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(30)(b) 2496 and must include, but is not limited to, the 50 services most 2497 frequently provided by the clinic. The posting may be a sign 2498 that must be at least 15 square feet in size or through an 2499 electronic messaging board that is at least 3 square feet in 2500 size. The failure of a clinic, including a clinic that is 2501 considered an urgent care center, to publish and post a schedule 2502 of charges as required by this section shall result in a fine of 2503 not more than $1,000, per day, until the schedule is published 2504 and posted. 2505 Section 51.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 2506 401.272, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2507 401.272âEmergency medical services community health care.â 2508 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law to the 2509 contrary: 2510 (b)âParamedics and emergency medical technicians shall 2511 operate under the medical direction of a physician through two 2512 way communication or pursuant to established standing orders or 2513 protocols and within the scope of their training when a patient 2514 is not transported to an emergency department or is transported 2515 to a facility other than a hospital as defined in s. 395.002 s. 2516 395.002(12). 2517 Section 52.âSubsections (4) and (5) of section 408.051, 2518 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2519 408.051âFlorida Electronic Health Records Exchange Act.â 2520 (4)âEMERGENCY RELEASE OF IDENTIFIABLE HEALTH RECORD.âA 2521 health care provider may release or access an identifiable 2522 health record of a patient without the patientâs consent for use 2523 in the treatment of the patient for an emergency medical 2524 condition, as defined in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(8), when the 2525 health care provider is unable to obtain the patientâs consent 2526 or the consent of the patient representative due to the 2527 patientâs condition or the nature of the situation requiring 2528 immediate medical attention. A health care provider who in good 2529 faith releases or accesses an identifiable health record of a 2530 patient in any form or medium under this subsection is immune 2531 from civil liability for accessing or releasing an identifiable 2532 health record. 2533 (5)âHOSPITAL DATA.âA hospital as defined in s. 395.002 s. 2534 395.002(12) which maintains certified electronic health record 2535 technology must make available admission, transfer, and 2536 discharge data to the agencyâs Florida Health Information 2537 Exchange program for the purpose of supporting public health 2538 data registries and patient care coordination. The agency may 2539 adopt rules to implement this subsection. 2540 Section 53.âSubsection (6) of section 408.07, Florida 2541 Statutes, is amended to read: 2542 408.07âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, with the 2543 exception of ss. 408.031-408.045, the term: 2544 (6)ââAmbulatory surgical centerâ means a facility licensed 2545 as an ambulatory surgical center under chapter 396 395. 2546 Section 54.âSubsection (9) of section 408.802, Florida 2547 Statutes, is amended to read: 2548 408.802âApplicability.âThis part applies to the provision 2549 of services that require licensure as defined in this part and 2550 to the following entities licensed, registered, or certified by 2551 the agency, as described in chapters 112, 383, 390, 394, 395, 2552 400, 429, 440, and 765: 2553 (9)âAmbulatory surgical centers, as provided under part I 2554 of chapter 396 395. 2555 Section 55.âSubsection (9) of section 408.820, Florida 2556 Statutes, is amended to read: 2557 408.820âExemptions.âExcept as prescribed in authorizing 2558 statutes, the following exemptions shall apply to specified 2559 requirements of this part: 2560 (9)âAmbulatory surgical centers, as provided under part I 2561 of chapter 396 395, are exempt from s. 408.810(7)-(10). 2562 Section 56.âSubsection (8) of section 409.905, Florida 2563 Statutes, is amended to read: 2564 409.905âMandatory Medicaid services.âThe agency may make 2565 payments for the following services, which are required of the 2566 state by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, furnished by 2567 Medicaid providers to recipients who are determined to be 2568 eligible on the dates on which the services were provided. Any 2569 service under this section shall be provided only when medically 2570 necessary and in accordance with state and federal law. 2571 Mandatory services rendered by providers in mobile units to 2572 Medicaid recipients may be restricted by the agency. Nothing in 2573 this section shall be construed to prevent or limit the agency 2574 from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, 2575 number of visits, number of services, or any other adjustments 2576 necessary to comply with the availability of moneys and any 2577 limitations or directions provided for in the General 2578 Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 2579 (8)âNURSING FACILITY SERVICES.âThe agency shall pay for 24 2580 hour-a-day nursing and rehabilitative services for a recipient 2581 in a nursing facility licensed under part II of chapter 400 or 2582 in a rural hospital, as defined in s. 395.602, or in a Medicare 2583 certified skilled nursing facility operated by a hospital, as 2584 defined in s. 395.002 by s. 395.002(10), that is licensed under 2585 part I of chapter 395, and in accordance with provisions set 2586 forth in s. 409.908(2)(a), which services are ordered by and 2587 provided under the direction of a licensed physician. However, 2588 if a nursing facility has been destroyed or otherwise made 2589 uninhabitable by natural disaster or other emergency and another 2590 nursing facility is not available, the agency must pay for 2591 similar services temporarily in a hospital licensed under part I 2592 of chapter 395 provided federal funding is approved and 2593 available. The agency shall pay only for bed-hold days if the 2594 facility has an occupancy rate of 95 percent or greater. The 2595 agency is authorized to seek any federal waivers to implement 2596 this policy. 2597 Section 57.âSubsection (3) of section 409.906, Florida 2598 Statutes, is amended to read: 2599 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 2600 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 2601 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 2602 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 2603 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 2604 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 2605 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 2606 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 2607 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 2608 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 2609 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 2610 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 2611 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 2612 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 2613 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 2614 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 2615 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 2616 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 2617 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 2618 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 2619 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 2620 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 2621 (3)âAMBULATORY SURGICAL CENTER SERVICES.âThe agency may pay 2622 for services provided to a recipient in an ambulatory surgical 2623 center licensed under part I of chapter 396 395, by or under the 2624 direction of a licensed physician or dentist. 2625 Section 58.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 2626 409.975, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2627 409.975âManaged care plan accountability.âIn addition to 2628 the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers 2629 participating in the managed medical assistance program shall 2630 comply with the requirements of this section. 2631 (1)âPROVIDER NETWORKS.âManaged care plans must develop and 2632 maintain provider networks that meet the medical needs of their 2633 enrollees in accordance with standards established pursuant to 2634 s. 409.967(2)(c). Except as provided in this section, managed 2635 care plans may limit the providers in their networks based on 2636 credentials, quality indicators, and price. 2637 (b)âCertain providers are statewide resources and essential 2638 providers for all managed care plans in all regions. All managed 2639 care plans must include these essential providers in their 2640 networks. Statewide essential providers include: 2641 1.âFaculty plans of Florida medical schools. 2642 2.âRegional perinatal intensive care centers as defined in 2643 s. 383.16(2). 2644 3.âHospitals licensed as specialty childrenâs hospitals as 2645 defined in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(28). 2646 4.âAccredited and integrated systems serving medically 2647 complex children which comprise separately licensed, but 2648 commonly owned, health care providers delivering at least the 2649 following services: medical group home, in-home and outpatient 2650 nursing care and therapies, pharmacy services, durable medical 2651 equipment, and Prescribed Pediatric Extended Care. 2652 5.âFlorida cancer hospitals that meet the criteria in 42 2653 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v). 2654 2655 Managed care plans that have not contracted with all statewide 2656 essential providers in all regions as of the first date of 2657 recipient enrollment must continue to negotiate in good faith. 2658 Payments to physicians on the faculty of nonparticipating 2659 Florida medical schools shall be made at the applicable Medicaid 2660 rate. Payments for services rendered by regional perinatal 2661 intensive care centers shall be made at the applicable Medicaid 2662 rate as of the first day of the contract between the agency and 2663 the plan. Except for payments for emergency services, payments 2664 to nonparticipating specialty childrenâs hospitals, and payments 2665 to nonparticipating Florida cancer hospitals that meet the 2666 criteria in 42 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v), shall equal the 2667 highest rate established by contract between that provider and 2668 any other Medicaid managed care plan. 2669 Section 59.âSubsection (7) of section 456.013, Florida 2670 Statutes, is amended to read: 2671 456.013âDepartment; general licensing provisions.â 2672 (7)âThe boards, or the department when there is no board, 2673 shall require the completion of a 2-hour course relating to 2674 prevention of medical errors as part of the biennial renewal 2675 process. The 2-hour course counts toward the total number of 2676 continuing education hours required for the profession. The 2677 course must be approved by the board or department, as 2678 appropriate, and must include a study of root-cause analysis, 2679 error reduction and prevention, and patient safety. In addition, 2680 the course approved by the Board of Medicine and the Board of 2681 Osteopathic Medicine must include information relating to the 2682 five most misdiagnosed conditions during the previous biennium, 2683 as determined by the board. If the course is being offered by a 2684 facility licensed under pursuant to chapter 395 or chapter 396 2685 for its employees, the board may approve up to 1 hour of the 2 2686 hour course to be specifically related to error reduction and 2687 prevention methods used in that facility. 2688 Section 60.âSubsection (5) of section 456.0135, Florida 2689 Statutes, is amended to read: 2690 456.0135âGeneral background screening provisions.â 2691 (5)âIn addition to the offenses listed in s. 435.04, all 2692 persons required to undergo background screening under this 2693 section, other than those licensed under s. 465.022, must not 2694 have an arrest awaiting final disposition for, must not have 2695 been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or entered a 2696 plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, and must not have been 2697 adjudicated delinquent and the record not have been sealed or 2698 expunged for an offense under s. 784.03 or any similar offense 2699 of another jurisdiction relating to battery, if the victim is a 2700 vulnerable adult as defined in s. 415.102 or a patient or 2701 resident of a facility licensed under chapter 395, chapter 396, 2702 chapter 400, or chapter 429. 2703 Section 61.âSubsection (5) of section 456.041, Florida 2704 Statutes, is amended to read: 2705 456.041âPractitioner profile; creation.â 2706 (5)âThe Department of Health shall include the date of a 2707 hospital or ambulatory surgical center disciplinary action taken 2708 by a licensed hospital or an ambulatory surgical center, in 2709 accordance with the requirements of ss. 395.013 and 396.212 s. 2710 395.0193, in the practitioner profile. The department shall 2711 state whether the action related to professional competence and 2712 whether it related to the delivery of services to a patient. 2713 Section 62.âParagraph (n) of subsection (3) of section 2714 456.053, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2715 456.053âFinancial arrangements between referring health 2716 care providers and providers of health care services.â 2717 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âFor the purpose of this section, the word, 2718 phrase, or term: 2719 (n)ââReferralâ means any referral of a patient by a health 2720 care provider for health care services, including, without 2721 limitation: 2722 1.âThe forwarding of a patient by a health care provider to 2723 another health care provider or to an entity which provides or 2724 supplies designated health services or any other health care 2725 item or service; or 2726 2.âThe request or establishment of a plan of care by a 2727 health care provider, which includes the provision of designated 2728 health services or other health care item or service. 2729 3.âThe following orders, recommendations, or plans of care 2730 do shall not constitute a referral by a health care provider: 2731 a.âBy a radiologist for diagnostic-imaging services. 2732 b.âBy a physician specializing in the provision of 2733 radiation therapy services for such services. 2734 c.âBy a medical oncologist for drugs and solutions to be 2735 prepared and administered intravenously to such oncologistâs 2736 patient, as well as for the supplies and equipment used in 2737 connection therewith to treat such patient for cancer and the 2738 complications thereof. 2739 d.âBy a cardiologist for cardiac catheterization services. 2740 e.âBy a pathologist for diagnostic clinical laboratory 2741 tests and pathological examination services, if furnished by or 2742 under the supervision of such pathologist pursuant to a 2743 consultation requested by another physician. 2744 f.âBy a health care provider who is the sole provider or 2745 member of a group practice for designated health services or 2746 other health care items or services that are prescribed or 2747 provided solely for such referring health care providerâs or 2748 group practiceâs own patients, and that are provided or 2749 performed by or under the supervision of such referring health 2750 care provider or group practice if such supervision complies 2751 with all applicable Medicare payment and coverage rules for 2752 services; provided, however, a physician licensed pursuant to 2753 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, or chapter 461 or an 2754 advanced practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 2755 may refer a patient to a sole provider or group practice for 2756 diagnostic imaging services, excluding radiation therapy 2757 services, for which the sole provider or group practice billed 2758 both the technical and the professional fee for or on behalf of 2759 the patient, if the referring physician or advanced practice 2760 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 has no investment 2761 interest in the practice. The diagnostic imaging service 2762 referred to a group practice or sole provider must be a 2763 diagnostic imaging service normally provided within the scope of 2764 practice to the patients of the group practice or sole provider. 2765 The group practice or sole provider may accept no more than 15 2766 percent of their patients receiving diagnostic imaging services 2767 from outside referrals, excluding radiation therapy services. 2768 However, the 15 percent limitation of this sub-subparagraph and 2769 the requirements of subparagraph (4)(a)2. do not apply to a 2770 group practice entity that owns an accountable care organization 2771 or an entity operating under an advanced alternative payment 2772 model according to federal regulations if such entity provides 2773 diagnostic imaging services and has more than 30,000 patients 2774 enrolled per year. 2775 g.âBy a health care provider for services provided by an 2776 ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395. 2777 h.âBy a urologist for lithotripsy services. 2778 i.âBy a dentist for dental services performed by an 2779 employee of or health care provider who is an independent 2780 contractor with the dentist or group practice of which the 2781 dentist is a member. 2782 j.âBy a physician for infusion therapy services to a 2783 patient of that physician or a member of that physicianâs group 2784 practice. 2785 k.âBy a nephrologist for renal dialysis services and 2786 supplies, except laboratory services. 2787 l.âBy a health care provider whose principal professional 2788 practice consists of treating patients in their private 2789 residences for services to be rendered in such private 2790 residences, except for services rendered by a home health agency 2791 licensed under chapter 400. For purposes of this sub 2792 subparagraph, the term âprivate residencesâ includes patientsâ 2793 private homes, independent living centers, and assisted living 2794 facilities, but does not include skilled nursing facilities. 2795 m.âBy a health care provider for sleep-related testing. 2796 Section 63.âSubsection (3) of section 456.056, Florida 2797 Statutes, is amended to read: 2798 456.056âTreatment of Medicare beneficiaries; refusal, 2799 emergencies, consulting physicians.â 2800 (3)âIf treatment is provided to a beneficiary for an 2801 emergency medical condition as defined in s. 395.002 s. 2802 395.002(8)(a), the physician must accept Medicare assignment 2803 provided that the requirement to accept Medicare assignment for 2804 an emergency medical condition does shall not apply to treatment 2805 rendered after the patient is stabilized, or the treatment that 2806 is unrelated to the original emergency medical condition. For 2807 the purpose of this subsection, the term âstabilizedâ means is 2808 defined to mean with respect to an emergency medical condition, 2809 that no material deterioration of the condition is likely within 2810 reasonable medical probability. 2811 Section 64.âSubsection (2) of section 456.0575, Florida 2812 Statutes, is amended to read: 2813 456.0575âDuty to notify patients.â 2814 (2)âUpon request by a patient, before providing 2815 nonemergency medical services in a facility licensed under 2816 chapter 395 or chapter 396, a health care practitioner shall 2817 provide, in writing or by electronic means, a good faith 2818 estimate of reasonably anticipated charges to treat the 2819 patientâs condition at the facility. The health care 2820 practitioner shall provide the estimate to the patient within 7 2821 business days after receiving the request and is not required to 2822 adjust the estimate for any potential insurance coverage. The 2823 health care practitioner shall inform the patient that the 2824 patient may contact his or her health insurer or health 2825 maintenance organization for additional information concerning 2826 cost-sharing responsibilities. The health care practitioner 2827 shall provide information to uninsured patients and insured 2828 patients for whom the practitioner is not a network provider or 2829 preferred provider which discloses the practitionerâs financial 2830 assistance policy, including the application process, payment 2831 plans, discounts, or other available assistance, and the 2832 practitionerâs charity care policy and collection procedures. 2833 Such estimate does not preclude the actual charges from 2834 exceeding the estimate. Failure to provide the estimate in 2835 accordance with this subsection, without good cause, shall 2836 result in disciplinary action against the health care 2837 practitioner and a daily fine of $500 until the estimate is 2838 provided to the patient. The total fine may not exceed $5,000. 2839 Section 65.âParagraph (t) of subsection (1) of section 2840 456.072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2841 456.072âGrounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.â 2842 (1)âThe following acts shall constitute grounds for which 2843 the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be 2844 taken: 2845 (t)âFailing to identify through written notice, which may 2846 include the wearing of a name tag, or orally to a patient the 2847 type of license under which the practitioner is practicing. Any 2848 advertisement for health care services naming the practitioner 2849 must identify the type of license the practitioner holds. This 2850 paragraph does not apply to a practitioner while the 2851 practitioner is providing services in a facility licensed under 2852 chapter 394, chapter 395, chapter 396, chapter 400, or chapter 2853 429. Each board, or the department where there is no board, is 2854 authorized by rule to determine how its practitioners may comply 2855 with this disclosure requirement. 2856 Section 66.âParagraph (b) of subsection (12) of section 2857 456.073, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2858 456.073âDisciplinary proceedings.âDisciplinary proceedings 2859 for each board shall be within the jurisdiction of the 2860 department. 2861 (12) 2862 (b)âNo facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396, 2863 health maintenance organization certificated under part I of 2864 chapter 641, physician licensed under chapter 458, or 2865 osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 459 shall 2866 discharge, threaten to discharge, intimidate, or coerce any 2867 employee or staff member by reason of such employeeâs or staff 2868 memberâs report to the department about a physician licensed 2869 under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, or 2870 chapter 466 who may be guilty of incompetence, impairment, or 2871 unprofessional conduct so long as such report is given without 2872 intentional fraud or malice. 2873 Section 67.âSubsection (3) of section 458.3145, Florida 2874 Statutes, is amended to read: 2875 458.3145âMedical faculty certificate.â 2876 (3)âThe holder of a medical faculty certificate issued 2877 under this section has all rights and responsibilities 2878 prescribed by law for the holder of a license issued under s. 2879 458.311, except as specifically provided otherwise by law. Such 2880 responsibilities include compliance with continuing medical 2881 education requirements as set forth by rule of the board. A 2882 hospital licensed under chapter 395, an or ambulatory surgical 2883 center licensed under chapter 396 395, a health maintenance 2884 organization certified under chapter 641, an insurer as defined 2885 in s. 624.03, a multiple-employer welfare arrangement as defined 2886 in s. 624.437, or any other entity in this state, in considering 2887 and acting upon an application for staff membership, clinical 2888 privileges, or other credentials as a health care provider, may 2889 not deny the application of an otherwise qualified physician for 2890 such staff membership, clinical privileges, or other credentials 2891 solely because the applicant is a holder of a medical faculty 2892 certificate under this section. 2893 Section 68.âSubsection (2) of section 458.320, Florida 2894 Statutes, is amended to read: 2895 458.320âFinancial responsibility.â 2896 (2)âPhysicians who perform surgery in an ambulatory 2897 surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395 and, as a 2898 continuing condition of hospital staff privileges, physicians 2899 who have staff privileges must also establish financial 2900 responsibility by one of the following methods: 2901 (a)âEstablishing and maintaining an escrow account 2902 consisting of cash or assets eligible for deposit in accordance 2903 with s. 625.52 in the per claim amounts specified in paragraph 2904 (b). The required escrow amount set forth in this paragraph may 2905 not be used for litigation costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for 2906 the defense of any medical malpractice claim. 2907 (b)âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 2908 coverage in an amount not less than $250,000 per claim, with a 2909 minimum annual aggregate of not less than $750,000 from an 2910 authorized insurer as defined under s. 624.09, from a surplus 2911 lines insurer as defined under s. 626.914(2), from a risk 2912 retention group as defined under s. 627.942, from the Joint 2913 Underwriting Association established under s. 627.351(4), 2914 through a plan of self-insurance as provided in s. 627.357, or 2915 through a plan of self-insurance which meets the conditions 2916 specified for satisfying financial responsibility in s. 766.110. 2917 The required coverage amount set forth in this paragraph may not 2918 be used for litigation costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for the 2919 defense of any medical malpractice claim. 2920 (c)âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired irrevocable 2921 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 2922 amount not less than $250,000 per claim, with a minimum 2923 aggregate availability of credit of not less than $750,000. The 2924 letter of credit must be payable to the physician as beneficiary 2925 upon presentment of a final judgment indicating liability and 2926 awarding damages to be paid by the physician or upon presentment 2927 of a settlement agreement signed by all parties to such 2928 agreement when such final judgment or settlement is a result of 2929 a claim arising out of the rendering of, or the failure to 2930 render, medical care and services. The letter of credit may not 2931 be used for litigation costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for the 2932 defense of any medical malpractice claim. The letter of credit 2933 must be nonassignable and nontransferable. The letter of credit 2934 must be issued by any bank or savings association organized and 2935 existing under the laws of this state or any bank or savings 2936 association organized under the laws of the United States which 2937 has its principal place of business in this state or has a 2938 branch office that is authorized under the laws of this state or 2939 of the United States to receive deposits in this state. 2940 2941 This subsection shall be inclusive of the coverage in subsection 2942 (1). 2943 Section 69.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 2944 458.3265, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2945 458.3265âPain-management clinics.â 2946 (1)âREGISTRATION.â 2947 (a)1.âAs used in this section, the term: 2948 a.ââBoard eligibleâ means successful completion of an 2949 anesthesia, physical medicine and rehabilitation, rheumatology, 2950 or neurology residency program approved by the Accreditation 2951 Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American 2952 Osteopathic Association for a period of 6 years from successful 2953 completion of such residency program. 2954 b.ââChronic nonmalignant painâ means pain unrelated to 2955 cancer which persists beyond the usual course of disease or the 2956 injury that is the cause of the pain or more than 90 days after 2957 surgery. 2958 c.ââPain-management clinicâ or âclinicâ means any publicly 2959 or privately owned facility: 2960 (I)âThat advertises in any medium for any type of pain 2961 management services; or 2962 (II)âWhere in any month a majority of patients are 2963 prescribed opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, or 2964 carisoprodol for the treatment of chronic nonmalignant pain. 2965 2.âEach pain-management clinic must register with the 2966 department or hold a valid certificate of exemption pursuant to 2967 subsection (2). 2968 3.âThe following clinics are exempt from the registration 2969 requirement of paragraphs (c)-(m) and must apply to the 2970 department for a certificate of exemption: 2971 a.âA clinic licensed as a hospital under facility pursuant 2972 to chapter 395 or an ambulatory surgical center under chapter 2973 396; 2974 b.âA clinic in which the majority of the physicians who 2975 provide services in the clinic primarily provide surgical 2976 services; 2977 c.âA clinic owned by a publicly held corporation whose 2978 shares are traded on a national exchange or on the over-the 2979 counter market and whose total assets at the end of the 2980 corporationâs most recent fiscal quarter exceeded $50 million; 2981 d.âA clinic affiliated with an accredited medical school at 2982 which training is provided for medical students, residents, or 2983 fellows; 2984 e.âA clinic that does not prescribe controlled substances 2985 for the treatment of pain; 2986 f.âA clinic owned by a corporate entity exempt from federal 2987 taxation under 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3); 2988 g.âA clinic wholly owned and operated by one or more board 2989 eligible or board-certified anesthesiologists, physiatrists, 2990 rheumatologists, or neurologists; or 2991 h.âA clinic wholly owned and operated by a physician 2992 multispecialty practice where one or more board-eligible or 2993 board-certified medical specialists, who have also completed 2994 fellowships in pain medicine approved by the Accreditation 2995 Council for Graduate Medical Education or who are also board 2996 certified in pain medicine by the American Board of Pain 2997 Medicine or a board approved by the American Board of Medical 2998 Specialties, the American Board of Physician Specialties, or the 2999 American Osteopathic Association, perform interventional pain 3000 procedures of the type routinely billed using surgical codes. 3001 Section 70.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph 3002 (a) of subsection (2) of section 458.328, Florida Statutes, are 3003 amended to read: 3004 458.328âOffice surgeries.â 3005 (1)âREGISTRATION.â 3006 (a)1.âAn office in which a physician performs a liposuction 3007 procedure in which more than 1,000 cubic centimeters of 3008 supernatant fat is temporarily or permanently removed, a Level 3009 II office surgery, or a Level III office surgery must register 3010 with the department. A facility licensed under chapter 390, or 3011 chapter 395, or chapter 396 may not be registered under this 3012 section. 3013 2.âThe department must complete an inspection of any office 3014 seeking registration under this section before the office may be 3015 registered. 3016 (2)âSTANDARDS OF PRACTICE.â 3017 (a)âA physician may not perform any surgery or procedure 3018 identified in paragraph (1)(a) in a setting other than an office 3019 surgery setting registered under this section or a facility 3020 licensed under chapter 390, or chapter 395, or chapter 396, as 3021 applicable. The board shall impose a fine of $5,000 per incident 3022 on a physician who violates this paragraph. 3023 Section 71.âParagraph (g) of subsection (4) of section 3024 458.347, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3025 458.347âPhysician assistants.â 3026 (4)âPERFORMANCE OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.â 3027 (g)âA supervisory physician may delegate to a licensed 3028 physician assistant the authority to, and the licensed physician 3029 assistant acting under the direction of the supervisory 3030 physician may, order any medication for administration to the 3031 supervisory physicianâs patient in a facility licensed under 3032 chapter 395, chapter 396, or part II of chapter 400, 3033 notwithstanding any provisions in chapter 465 or chapter 893 3034 which may prohibit this delegation. 3035 Section 72.âParagraph (f) of subsection (4) of section 3036 458.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3037 458.351âReports of adverse incidents in office practice 3038 settings.â 3039 (4)âFor purposes of notification to the department pursuant 3040 to this section, the term âadverse incidentâ means an event over 3041 which the physician or licensee could exercise control and which 3042 is associated in whole or in part with a medical intervention, 3043 rather than the condition for which such intervention occurred, 3044 and which results in the following patient injuries: 3045 (f)âAny condition that required the transfer of a patient 3046 to a hospital licensed under chapter 395 from an ambulatory 3047 surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395 or any facility 3048 or any office maintained by a physician for the practice of 3049 medicine which is not licensed under chapter 395. 3050 Section 73.âSubsection (2) of section 459.0085, Florida 3051 Statutes, is amended to read: 3052 459.0085âFinancial responsibility.â 3053 (2)âOsteopathic physicians who perform surgery in an 3054 ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395 and, 3055 as a continuing condition of hospital staff privileges, 3056 osteopathic physicians who have staff privileges must also 3057 establish financial responsibility by one of the following 3058 methods: 3059 (a)âEstablishing and maintaining an escrow account 3060 consisting of cash or assets eligible for deposit in accordance 3061 with s. 625.52 in the per-claim amounts specified in paragraph 3062 (b). The required escrow amount set forth in this paragraph may 3063 not be used for litigation costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for 3064 the defense of any medical malpractice claim. 3065 (b)âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 3066 coverage in an amount not less than $250,000 per claim, with a 3067 minimum annual aggregate of not less than $750,000 from an 3068 authorized insurer as defined under s. 624.09, from a surplus 3069 lines insurer as defined under s. 626.914(2), from a risk 3070 retention group as defined under s. 627.942, from the Joint 3071 Underwriting Association established under s. 627.351(4), 3072 through a plan of self-insurance as provided in s. 627.357, or 3073 through a plan of self-insurance that meets the conditions 3074 specified for satisfying financial responsibility in s. 766.110. 3075 The required coverage amount set forth in this paragraph may not 3076 be used for litigation costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for the 3077 defense of any medical malpractice claim. 3078 (c)âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired, irrevocable 3079 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 3080 amount not less than $250,000 per claim, with a minimum 3081 aggregate availability of credit of not less than $750,000. The 3082 letter of credit must be payable to the osteopathic physician as 3083 beneficiary upon presentment of a final judgment indicating 3084 liability and awarding damages to be paid by the osteopathic 3085 physician or upon presentment of a settlement agreement signed 3086 by all parties to such agreement when such final judgment or 3087 settlement is a result of a claim arising out of the rendering 3088 of, or the failure to render, medical care and services. The 3089 letter of credit may not be used for litigation costs or 3090 attorney attorneyâs fees for the defense of any medical 3091 malpractice claim. The letter of credit must be nonassignable 3092 and nontransferable. The letter of credit must be issued by any 3093 bank or savings association organized and existing under the 3094 laws of this state or any bank or savings association organized 3095 under the laws of the United States which has its principal 3096 place of business in this state or has a branch office that is 3097 authorized under the laws of this state or of the United States 3098 to receive deposits in this state. 3099 3100 This subsection shall be inclusive of the coverage in subsection 3101 (1). 3102 Section 74.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 3103 459.0137, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3104 459.0137âPain-management clinics.â 3105 (1)âREGISTRATION.â 3106 (a)1.âAs used in this section, the term: 3107 a.ââBoard eligibleâ means successful completion of an 3108 anesthesia, physical medicine and rehabilitation, rheumatology, 3109 or neurology residency program approved by the Accreditation 3110 Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American 3111 Osteopathic Association for a period of 6 years from successful 3112 completion of such residency program. 3113 b.ââChronic nonmalignant painâ means pain unrelated to 3114 cancer which persists beyond the usual course of disease or the 3115 injury that is the cause of the pain or more than 90 days after 3116 surgery. 3117 c.ââPain-management clinicâ or âclinicâ means any publicly 3118 or privately owned facility: 3119 (I)âThat advertises in any medium for any type of pain 3120 management services; or 3121 (II)âWhere in any month a majority of patients are 3122 prescribed opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, or 3123 carisoprodol for the treatment of chronic nonmalignant pain. 3124 2.âEach pain-management clinic must register with the 3125 department or hold a valid certificate of exemption pursuant to 3126 subsection (2). 3127 3.âThe following clinics are exempt from the registration 3128 requirement of paragraphs (c)-(m) and must apply to the 3129 department for a certificate of exemption: 3130 a.âA clinic licensed as a hospital under facility pursuant 3131 to chapter 395 or an ambulatory surgical center under chapter 3132 396; 3133 b.âA clinic in which the majority of the physicians who 3134 provide services in the clinic primarily provide surgical 3135 services; 3136 c.âA clinic owned by a publicly held corporation whose 3137 shares are traded on a national exchange or on the over-the 3138 counter market and whose total assets at the end of the 3139 corporationâs most recent fiscal quarter exceeded $50 million; 3140 d.âA clinic affiliated with an accredited medical school at 3141 which training is provided for medical students, residents, or 3142 fellows; 3143 e.âA clinic that does not prescribe controlled substances 3144 for the treatment of pain; 3145 f.âA clinic owned by a corporate entity exempt from federal 3146 taxation under 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3); 3147 g.âA clinic wholly owned and operated by one or more board 3148 eligible or board-certified anesthesiologists, physiatrists, 3149 rheumatologists, or neurologists; or 3150 h.âA clinic wholly owned and operated by a physician 3151 multispecialty practice where one or more board-eligible or 3152 board-certified medical specialists, who have also completed 3153 fellowships in pain medicine approved by the Accreditation 3154 Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American 3155 Osteopathic Association or who are also board-certified in pain 3156 medicine by the American Board of Pain Medicine or a board 3157 approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties, the 3158 American Board of Physician Specialties, or the American 3159 Osteopathic Association, perform interventional pain procedures 3160 of the type routinely billed using surgical codes. 3161 Section 75.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph 3162 (a) of subsection (2) of section 459.0138, Florida Statutes, are 3163 amended to read: 3164 459.0138âOffice surgeries.â 3165 (1)âREGISTRATION.â 3166 (a)1.âAn office in which a physician performs a liposuction 3167 procedure in which more than 1,000 cubic centimeters of 3168 supernatant fat is temporarily or permanently removed, a Level 3169 II office surgery, or a Level III office surgery must register 3170 with the department. A facility licensed under chapter 390, or 3171 chapter 395, or chapter 396 may not be registered under this 3172 section. 3173 2.âThe department must complete an inspection of any office 3174 seeking registration under this section before the office may be 3175 registered. 3176 (2)âSTANDARDS OF PRACTICE.â 3177 (a)âA physician may not perform any surgery or procedure 3178 identified in paragraph (1)(a) in a setting other than an office 3179 surgery setting registered under this section or a facility 3180 licensed under chapter 390, or chapter 395, or chapter 396, as 3181 applicable. The board shall impose a fine of $5,000 per incident 3182 on a physician who violates this paragraph. 3183 Section 76.âParagraph (ll) of subsection (1) and 3184 subsections (7) and (9) of section 459.015, Florida Statutes, 3185 are amended to read: 3186 459.015âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by the 3187 board and department.â 3188 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 3189 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 3190 (ll)âFailing to report to the department any licensee under 3191 chapter 458 or under this chapter who the osteopathic physician 3192 or physician assistant knows has violated the grounds for 3193 disciplinary action set out in the law under which that person 3194 is licensed and who provides health care services in a facility 3195 licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396, or a health 3196 maintenance organization certificated under part I of chapter 3197 641, in which the osteopathic physician or physician assistant 3198 also provides services. 3199 (7)âUpon the departmentâs receipt from the Agency for 3200 Health Care Administration pursuant to s. 395.0197 or s. 396.213 3201 of the name of an osteopathic physician whose conduct may 3202 constitute grounds for disciplinary action by the department, 3203 the department shall investigate the occurrences upon which the 3204 report was based and determine if action by the department 3205 against the osteopathic physician is warranted. 3206 (9)âWhen an investigation of an osteopathic physician is 3207 undertaken, the department shall promptly furnish to the 3208 osteopathic physician or his or her attorney a copy of the 3209 complaint or document which resulted in the initiation of the 3210 investigation. For purposes of this subsection, such documents 3211 include, but are not limited to: the pertinent portions of an 3212 annual report submitted to the department pursuant to s. 3213 395.0197(6) or s. 396.213(6); a report of an adverse incident 3214 which is provided to the department pursuant to s. 395.0197 or 3215 s. 396.213; a report of peer review disciplinary action 3216 submitted to the department pursuant to s. 395.0193(4), s. 3217 396.212(4), or s. 459.016, provided that the investigations, 3218 proceedings, and records relating to such peer review 3219 disciplinary action shall continue to retain their privileged 3220 status even as to the licensee who is the subject of the 3221 investigation, as provided by ss. 395.0193(8), 396.212(8), and 3222 459.016(3); a report of a closed claim submitted pursuant to s. 3223 627.912; a presuit notice submitted pursuant to s. 766.106(2); 3224 and a petition brought under the Florida Birth-Related 3225 Neurological Injury Compensation Plan, pursuant to s. 3226 766.305(2). The osteopathic physician may submit a written 3227 response to the information contained in the complaint or 3228 document which resulted in the initiation of the investigation 3229 within 45 days after service to the osteopathic physician of the 3230 complaint or document. The osteopathic physicianâs written 3231 response shall be considered by the probable cause panel. 3232 Section 77.âParagraph (f) of subsection (4) of section 3233 459.022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3234 459.022âPhysician assistants.â 3235 (4)âPERFORMANCE OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.â 3236 (f)âA supervisory physician may delegate to a licensed 3237 physician assistant the authority to, and the licensed physician 3238 assistant acting under the direction of the supervisory 3239 physician may, order any medication for administration to the 3240 supervisory physicianâs patient in a facility licensed under 3241 chapter 395, chapter 396, or part II of chapter 400, 3242 notwithstanding any provisions in chapter 465 or chapter 893 3243 which may prohibit this delegation. 3244 Section 78.âParagraph (f) of subsection (4) of section 3245 459.026, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3246 459.026âReports of adverse incidents in office practice 3247 settings.â 3248 (4)âFor purposes of notification to the department pursuant 3249 to this section, the term âadverse incidentâ means an event over 3250 which the physician or licensee could exercise control and which 3251 is associated in whole or in part with a medical intervention, 3252 rather than the condition for which such intervention occurred, 3253 and which results in the following patient injuries: 3254 (f)âAny condition that required the transfer of a patient 3255 to a hospital licensed under chapter 395 from an ambulatory 3256 surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395 or any facility 3257 or any office maintained by a physician for the practice of 3258 medicine which is not licensed under chapter 395. 3259 Section 79.âParagraph (ee) of subsection (1) of section 3260 460.413, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3261 460.413âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by board or 3262 department.â 3263 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 3264 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 3265 (ee)âFailing to report to the department any licensee under 3266 chapter 458 or under chapter 459 who the chiropractic physician 3267 or chiropractic physicianâs assistant knows has violated the 3268 grounds for disciplinary action set out in the law under which 3269 that person is licensed and who provides health care services in 3270 a facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396, or a 3271 health maintenance organization certificated under part I of 3272 chapter 641, in which the chiropractic physician or chiropractic 3273 physicianâs assistant also provides services. 3274 Section 80.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 3275 460.4167, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3276 460.4167âProprietorship by persons other than licensed 3277 chiropractic physicians.â 3278 (1)âA person may not employ a chiropractic physician 3279 licensed under this chapter or engage a chiropractic physician 3280 licensed under this chapter as an independent contractor to 3281 provide services that chiropractic physicians are authorized to 3282 offer under this chapter, unless the person is any of the 3283 following: 3284 (c)âAn entity that is wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 3285 by an entity licensed or registered by the state under chapter 3286 395 or chapter 396. 3287 Section 81.âParagraph (aa) of subsection (1) and paragraph 3288 (b) of subsection (5) of section 461.013, Florida Statutes, are 3289 amended to read: 3290 461.013âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by the 3291 board; investigations by department.â 3292 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 3293 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 3294 (aa)âFailing to report to the department any licensee under 3295 chapter 458 or chapter 459 who the podiatric physician knows has 3296 violated the grounds for disciplinary action set out in the law 3297 under which that person is licensed and who provides health care 3298 services in a facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 3299 396, or a health maintenance organization certificated under 3300 part I of chapter 641, in which the podiatric physician also 3301 provides services. 3302 (5) 3303 (b)âUpon the departmentâs receipt from the Agency for 3304 Health Care Administration pursuant to s. 395.0197 or s. 396.213 3305 of the name of the podiatric physician whose conduct may 3306 constitute grounds for disciplinary action by the department, 3307 the department shall investigate the occurrences upon which the 3308 report was based and determine if action by the department 3309 against the podiatric physician is warranted. 3310 Section 82.âParagraph (e) of subsection (3) of section 3311 464.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3312 464.012âLicensure of advanced practice registered nurses; 3313 fees; controlled substance prescribing.â 3314 (3)âAn advanced practice registered nurse shall perform 3315 those functions authorized in this section within the framework 3316 of an established protocol that must be maintained on site at 3317 the location or locations at which an advanced practice 3318 registered nurse practices, unless the advanced practice 3319 registered nurse is registered and practicing under s. 464.0123. 3320 In the case of multiple supervising physicians in the same 3321 group, an advanced practice registered nurse must enter into a 3322 supervisory protocol with at least one physician within the 3323 physician group practice. A practitioner currently licensed 3324 under chapter 458, chapter 459, or chapter 466 shall maintain 3325 supervision for directing the specific course of medical 3326 treatment. Within the established framework, an advanced 3327 practice registered nurse may: 3328 (e)âOrder any medication for administration to a patient in 3329 a facility licensed under chapter 395, chapter 396, or part II 3330 of chapter 400, notwithstanding any provisions in chapter 465 or 3331 chapter 893. 3332 Section 83.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 3333 465.0125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3334 465.0125âConsultant pharmacist license; application, 3335 renewal, fees; responsibilities; rules.â 3336 (1)âThe department shall issue or renew a consultant 3337 pharmacist license upon receipt of an initial or renewal 3338 application that conforms to the requirements for consultant 3339 pharmacist initial licensure or renewal as adopted by the board 3340 by rule and a fee set by the board not to exceed $250. To be 3341 licensed as a consultant pharmacist, a pharmacist must complete 3342 additional training as required by the board. 3343 (e)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âhealth care 3344 facilityâ means a an ambulatory surgical center or hospital 3345 licensed under chapter 395, an ambulatory surgical center 3346 licensed under chapter 396, an alcohol or chemical dependency 3347 treatment center licensed under chapter 397, an inpatient 3348 hospice licensed under part IV of chapter 400, a nursing home 3349 licensed under part II of chapter 400, an ambulatory care center 3350 as defined in s. 408.07, or a nursing home component under 3351 chapter 400 within a continuing care facility licensed under 3352 chapter 651. 3353 Section 84.âParagraph (o) of subsection (1) of section 3354 465.016, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3355 465.016âDisciplinary actions.â 3356 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 3357 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 3358 (o)âFailing to report to the department any licensee under 3359 chapter 458 or under chapter 459 who the pharmacist knows has 3360 violated the grounds for disciplinary action set out in the law 3361 under which that person is licensed and who provides health care 3362 services in a facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 3363 396, or a health maintenance organization certificated under 3364 part I of chapter 641, in which the pharmacist also provides 3365 services. However, a person who the licensee knows is unable to 3366 practice medicine or osteopathic medicine with reasonable skill 3367 and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, 3368 drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material, or 3369 as a result of a mental or physical condition, may be reported 3370 to a consultant operating an impaired practitioner program as 3371 described in s. 456.076 rather than to the department. 3372 Section 85.âParagraph (hh) of subsection (1) of section 3373 466.028, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3374 466.028âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by the 3375 board.â 3376 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 3377 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 3378 (hh)âFailing to report to the department any licensee under 3379 chapter 458 or chapter 459 who the dentist knows has violated 3380 the grounds for disciplinary action set out in the law under 3381 which that person is licensed and who provides health care 3382 services in a facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 3383 396, or a health maintenance organization certificated under 3384 part I of chapter 641, in which the dentist also provides 3385 services. 3386 Section 86.âParagraph (l) of subsection (1) of section 3387 468.505, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3388 468.505âExemptions; exceptions.â 3389 (1)âNothing in this part may be construed as prohibiting or 3390 restricting the practice, services, or activities of: 3391 (l)âA person employed by a nursing facility exempt from 3392 licensing under s. 395.002 s. 395.002(12), or a person exempt 3393 from licensing under s. 464.022. 3394 Section 87.âParagraph (d) of subsection (11) of section 3395 486.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3396 486.021âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, unless the 3397 context otherwise requires, the term: 3398 (11)ââPractice of physical therapyâ means the performance 3399 of physical therapy assessments and the treatment of any 3400 disability, injury, disease, or other health condition of human 3401 beings, or the prevention of such disability, injury, disease, 3402 or other health condition, and the rehabilitation of such 3403 disability, injury, disease, or other health condition by 3404 alleviating impairments, functional movement limitations, and 3405 disabilities by designing, implementing, and modifying treatment 3406 interventions through therapeutic exercise; functional movement 3407 training in self-management and in-home, community, or work 3408 integration or reintegration; manual therapy; massage; airway 3409 clearance techniques; maintaining and restoring the 3410 integumentary system and wound care; physical agent or modality; 3411 mechanical or electrotherapeutic modality; patient-related 3412 instruction; the use of apparatus and equipment in the 3413 application of such treatment, prevention, or rehabilitation; 3414 the performance of tests of neuromuscular functions as an aid to 3415 the diagnosis or treatment of any human condition; or the 3416 performance of electromyography as an aid to the diagnosis of 3417 any human condition only upon compliance with the criteria set 3418 forth by the Board of Medicine. 3419 (d)âThis subsection does not authorize a physical therapist 3420 to implement a plan of treatment for a patient currently being 3421 treated in a facility licensed under pursuant to chapter 395 or 3422 chapter 396. 3423 Section 88.âSubsection (22) of section 499.003, Florida 3424 Statutes, is amended to read: 3425 499.003âDefinitions of terms used in this part.âAs used in 3426 this part, the term: 3427 (22)ââHealth care facilityâ means a health care facility 3428 licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396. 3429 Section 89.âSubsection (5) of section 499.0295, Florida 3430 Statutes, is amended to read: 3431 499.0295âExperimental treatments for terminal conditions.â 3432 (5)âA hospital or health care facility licensed under 3433 chapter 395 or chapter 396, as applicable, is not required to 3434 provide new or additional services unless those services are 3435 approved by the hospital or health care facility. 3436 Section 90.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 3437 553.80, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3438 553.80âEnforcement.â 3439 (1)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (a)-(g), each local 3440 government and each legally constituted enforcement district 3441 with statutory authority shall regulate building construction 3442 and, where authorized in the state agencyâs enabling 3443 legislation, each state agency shall enforce the Florida 3444 Building Code required by this part on all public or private 3445 buildings, structures, and facilities, unless such 3446 responsibility has been delegated to another unit of government 3447 under s. 553.79(11). 3448 (c)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 553.79 and this 3449 section, facilities subject to the provisions of chapter 395, 3450 chapter 396, and parts II and VIII of chapter 400 shall have 3451 facility plans reviewed and construction surveyed by the state 3452 agency authorized to do so under the requirements of chapter 395 3453 and parts II and VIII of chapter 400 and the certification 3454 requirements of the Federal Government. Facilities subject to 3455 the provisions of part IV of chapter 400 may have facility plans 3456 reviewed and shall have construction surveyed by the state 3457 agency authorized to do so under the requirements of part IV of 3458 chapter 400 and the certification requirements of the Federal 3459 Government. 3460 3461 The governing bodies of local governments may provide a schedule 3462 of fees, as authorized by s. 125.56(2) or s. 166.222 and this 3463 section, for the enforcement of the provisions of this part. 3464 Such fees shall be used solely for carrying out the local 3465 governmentâs responsibilities in enforcing the Florida Building 3466 Code. The authority of state enforcing agencies to set fees for 3467 enforcement shall be derived from authority existing on July 1, 3468 1998. However, nothing contained in this subsection shall 3469 operate to limit such agencies from adjusting their fee schedule 3470 in conformance with existing authority. 3471 Section 91.âParagraph (h) of subsection (4) of section 3472 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3473 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 3474 (4)âMEDICAL MALPRACTICE RISK APPORTIONMENT; ASSOCIATION 3475 CONTRACTS AND PURCHASES.â 3476 (h)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 3477 1.ââHealth care providerâ means hospitals licensed under 3478 chapter 395; physicians licensed under chapter 458; osteopathic 3479 physicians licensed under chapter 459; podiatric physicians 3480 licensed under chapter 461; dentists licensed under chapter 466; 3481 chiropractic physicians licensed under chapter 460; naturopaths 3482 licensed under chapter 462; nurses licensed under part I of 3483 chapter 464; midwives licensed under chapter 467; physician 3484 assistants licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459; physical 3485 therapists and physical therapist assistants licensed under 3486 chapter 486; health maintenance organizations certificated under 3487 part I of chapter 641; ambulatory surgical centers licensed 3488 under chapter 396 395; other medical facilities as defined in 3489 subparagraph 2.; blood banks, plasma centers, industrial 3490 clinics, and renal dialysis facilities; or professional 3491 associations, partnerships, corporations, joint ventures, or 3492 other associations for professional activity by health care 3493 providers. 3494 2.ââOther medical facilityâ means a facility the primary 3495 purpose of which is to provide human medical diagnostic services 3496 or a facility providing nonsurgical human medical treatment, to 3497 which facility the patient is admitted and from which facility 3498 the patient is discharged within the same working day, and which 3499 facility is not part of a hospital. However, a facility existing 3500 for the primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy 3501 or an office maintained by a physician or dentist for the 3502 practice of medicine may not be construed to be an âother 3503 medical facility.â 3504 3.ââHealth care facilityâ means any hospital licensed under 3505 chapter 395, health maintenance organization certificated under 3506 part I of chapter 641, ambulatory surgical center licensed under 3507 chapter 396 395, or other medical facility as defined in 3508 subparagraph 2. 3509 Section 92.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 3510 627.357, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3511 627.357âMedical malpractice self-insurance.â 3512 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 3513 (b)ââHealth care providerâ means any: 3514 1.âHospital licensed under chapter 395. 3515 2.âPhysician licensed, or physician assistant licensed, 3516 under chapter 458. 3517 3.âOsteopathic physician or physician assistant licensed 3518 under chapter 459. 3519 4.âPodiatric physician licensed under chapter 461. 3520 5.âHealth maintenance organization certificated under part 3521 I of chapter 641. 3522 6.âAmbulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 3523 395. 3524 7.âChiropractic physician licensed under chapter 460. 3525 8.âPsychologist licensed under chapter 490. 3526 9.âOptometrist licensed under chapter 463. 3527 10.âDentist licensed under chapter 466. 3528 11.âPharmacist licensed under chapter 465. 3529 12.âRegistered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced 3530 practice registered nurse licensed or registered under part I of 3531 chapter 464. 3532 13.âOther medical facility. 3533 14.âProfessional association, partnership, corporation, 3534 joint venture, or other association established by the 3535 individuals set forth in subparagraphs 2., 3., 4., 7., 8., 9., 3536 10., 11., and 12. for professional activity. 3537 Section 93.âSection 627.6056, Florida Statutes, is amended 3538 to read: 3539 627.6056âCoverage for ambulatory surgical center service. 3540 An No individual health insurance policy providing coverage on 3541 an expense-incurred basis or individual service or indemnity 3542 type contract issued by a nonprofit corporation, of any kind or 3543 description, may not shall be issued unless coverage provided 3544 for any service performed in an ambulatory surgical center, as 3545 defined in s. 396.202 s. 395.002, is provided if such service 3546 would have been covered under the terms of the policy or 3547 contract as an eligible inpatient service. 3548 Section 94.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 3549 627.6387, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3550 627.6387âShared savings incentive program.â 3551 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 3552 (a)ââHealth care providerâ means a hospital or facility 3553 licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396; an entity licensed 3554 under chapter 400; a health care practitioner as defined in s. 3555 456.001; a blood bank, plasma center, industrial clinic, or 3556 renal dialysis facility; or a professional association, 3557 partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other association 3558 for professional activity by health care providers. The term 3559 includes entities and professionals outside of this state with 3560 an active, unencumbered license for an equivalent facility or 3561 practitioner type issued by another state, the District of 3562 Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States. 3563 Section 95.âSubsection (3) of section 627.6405, Florida 3564 Statutes, is amended to read: 3565 627.6405âDecreasing inappropriate utilization of emergency 3566 care.â 3567 (3)âAs a disincentive for insureds to inappropriately use 3568 emergency department services for nonemergency care, health 3569 insurers may require higher copayments for urgent care or 3570 primary care provided in an emergency department and higher 3571 copayments for use of out-of-network emergency departments. 3572 Higher copayments may not be charged for the utilization of the 3573 emergency department for emergency care. For the purposes of 3574 this section, the term âemergency careâ has the same meaning as 3575 the term âemergency services and careâ as defined in s. 395.002 3576 s. 395.002(9) and includes services provided to rule out an 3577 emergency medical condition. 3578 Section 96.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 3579 627.64194, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3580 627.64194âCoverage requirements for services provided by 3581 nonparticipating providers; payment collection limitations.â 3582 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 3583 (b)ââFacilityâ means a licensed facility as defined in s. 3584 395.002 s. 395.002(17) and an urgent care center as defined in 3585 s. 395.002. 3586 Section 97.âSection 627.6616, Florida Statutes, is amended 3587 to read: 3588 627.6616âCoverage for ambulatory surgical center service.âA 3589 No group health insurance policy providing coverage on an 3590 expense-incurred basis, or group service or indemnity-type 3591 contract issued by a nonprofit corporation, or self-insured 3592 group health benefit plan or trust, of any kind or description, 3593 may not shall be issued unless coverage provided for any service 3594 performed in an ambulatory surgical center, as defined in s. 3595 396.202 s. 395.002, is provided if such service would have been 3596 covered under the terms of the policy or contract as an eligible 3597 inpatient service. 3598 Section 98.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 3599 627.6648, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3600 627.6648âShared savings incentive program.â 3601 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 3602 (a)ââHealth care providerâ means a hospital or facility 3603 licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396; an entity licensed 3604 under chapter 400; a health care practitioner as defined in s. 3605 456.001; a blood bank, plasma center, industrial clinic, or 3606 renal dialysis facility; or a professional association, 3607 partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other association 3608 for professional activity by health care providers. The term 3609 includes entities and professionals outside this state with an 3610 active, unencumbered license for an equivalent facility or 3611 practitioner type issued by another state, the District of 3612 Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States. 3613 Section 99.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 3614 627.736, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3615 627.736âRequired personal injury protection benefits; 3616 exclusions; priority; claims.â 3617 (1)âREQUIRED BENEFITS.âAn insurance policy complying with 3618 the security requirements of s. 627.733 must provide personal 3619 injury protection to the named insured, relatives residing in 3620 the same household unless excluded under s. 627.747, persons 3621 operating the insured motor vehicle, passengers in the motor 3622 vehicle, and other persons struck by the motor vehicle and 3623 suffering bodily injury while not an occupant of a self 3624 propelled vehicle, subject to subsection (2) and paragraph 3625 (4)(e), to a limit of $10,000 in medical and disability benefits 3626 and $5,000 in death benefits resulting from bodily injury, 3627 sickness, disease, or death arising out of the ownership, 3628 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as follows: 3629 (a)âMedical benefits.âEighty percent of all reasonable 3630 expenses for medically necessary medical, surgical, X-ray, 3631 dental, and rehabilitative services, including prosthetic 3632 devices and medically necessary ambulance, hospital, and nursing 3633 services if the individual receives initial services and care 3634 pursuant to subparagraph 1. within 14 days after the motor 3635 vehicle accident. The medical benefits provide reimbursement 3636 only for: 3637 1.âInitial services and care that are lawfully provided, 3638 supervised, ordered, or prescribed by a physician licensed under 3639 chapter 458 or chapter 459, a dentist licensed under chapter 3640 466, a chiropractic physician licensed under chapter 460, or an 3641 advanced practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 3642 or that are provided in a hospital or in a facility that owns, 3643 or is wholly owned by, a hospital. Initial services and care may 3644 also be provided by a person or entity licensed under part III 3645 of chapter 401 which provides emergency transportation and 3646 treatment. 3647 2.âUpon referral by a provider described in subparagraph 3648 1., follow-up followup services and care consistent with the 3649 underlying medical diagnosis rendered pursuant to subparagraph 3650 1. which may be provided, supervised, ordered, or prescribed 3651 only by a physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, a 3652 chiropractic physician licensed under chapter 460, a dentist 3653 licensed under chapter 466, or an advanced practice registered 3654 nurse registered under s. 464.0123, or, to the extent permitted 3655 by applicable law and under the supervision of such physician, 3656 osteopathic physician, chiropractic physician, or dentist, by a 3657 physician assistant licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 or 3658 an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 3659 464. Follow-up Followup services and care may also be provided 3660 by the following persons or entities: 3661 a.âA hospital licensed under chapter 395 or an ambulatory 3662 surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395. 3663 b.âAn entity wholly owned by one or more physicians 3664 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, chiropractic 3665 physicians licensed under chapter 460, advanced practice 3666 registered nurses registered under s. 464.0123, or dentists 3667 licensed under chapter 466 or by such practitioners and the 3668 spouse, parent, child, or sibling of such practitioners. 3669 c.âAn entity that owns or is wholly owned, directly or 3670 indirectly, by a hospital or hospitals. 3671 d.âA physical therapist licensed under chapter 486, based 3672 upon a referral by a provider described in this subparagraph. 3673 e.âA health care clinic licensed under part X of chapter 3674 400 which is accredited by an accrediting organization whose 3675 standards incorporate comparable regulations required by this 3676 state, or 3677 (I)âHas a medical director licensed under chapter 458, 3678 chapter 459, or chapter 460; 3679 (II)âHas been continuously licensed for more than 3 years 3680 or is a publicly traded corporation that issues securities 3681 traded on an exchange registered with the United States 3682 Securities and Exchange Commission as a national securities 3683 exchange; and 3684 (III)âProvides at least four of the following medical 3685 specialties: 3686 (A)âGeneral medicine. 3687 (B)âRadiography. 3688 (C)âOrthopedic medicine. 3689 (D)âPhysical medicine. 3690 (E)âPhysical therapy. 3691 (F)âPhysical rehabilitation. 3692 (G)âPrescribing or dispensing outpatient prescription 3693 medication. 3694 (H)âLaboratory services. 3695 3.âReimbursement for services and care provided in 3696 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. up to $10,000 if a physician 3697 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, a dentist licensed 3698 under chapter 466, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 3699 458 or chapter 459, or an advanced practice registered nurse 3700 licensed under chapter 464 has determined that the injured 3701 person had an emergency medical condition. 3702 4.âReimbursement for services and care provided in 3703 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. is limited to $2,500 if a 3704 provider listed in subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. determines 3705 that the injured person did not have an emergency medical 3706 condition. 3707 5.âMedical benefits do not include massage therapy as 3708 defined in s. 480.033 or acupuncture as defined in s. 457.102, 3709 regardless of the person, entity, or licensee providing massage 3710 therapy or acupuncture, and a licensed massage therapist or 3711 licensed acupuncturist may not be reimbursed for medical 3712 benefits under this section. 3713 6.âThe Financial Services Commission shall adopt by rule 3714 the form that must be used by an insurer and a health care 3715 provider specified in sub-subparagraph 2.b., sub-subparagraph 3716 2.c., or sub-subparagraph 2.e. to document that the health care 3717 provider meets the criteria of this paragraph. Such rule must 3718 include a requirement for a sworn statement or affidavit. 3719 3720 Only insurers writing motor vehicle liability insurance in this 3721 state may provide the required benefits of this section, and 3722 such insurer may not require the purchase of any other motor 3723 vehicle coverage other than the purchase of property damage 3724 liability coverage as required by s. 627.7275 as a condition for 3725 providing such benefits. Insurers may not require that property 3726 damage liability insurance in an amount greater than $10,000 be 3727 purchased in conjunction with personal injury protection. Such 3728 insurers shall make benefits and required property damage 3729 liability insurance coverage available through normal marketing 3730 channels. An insurer writing motor vehicle liability insurance 3731 in this state who fails to comply with such availability 3732 requirement as a general business practice violates part IX of 3733 chapter 626, and such violation constitutes an unfair method of 3734 competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice involving 3735 the business of insurance. An insurer committing such violation 3736 is subject to the penalties provided under that part, as well as 3737 those provided elsewhere in the insurance code. 3738 Section 100.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 3739 627.912, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3740 627.912âProfessional liability claims and actions; reports 3741 by insurers and health care providers; annual report by office.â 3742 (1)(a)âEach self-insurer authorized under s. 627.357 and 3743 each commercial self-insurance fund authorized under s. 624.462, 3744 authorized insurer, surplus lines insurer, risk retention group, 3745 and joint underwriting association providing professional 3746 liability insurance to a practitioner of medicine licensed under 3747 chapter 458, to a practitioner of osteopathic medicine licensed 3748 under chapter 459, to a podiatric physician licensed under 3749 chapter 461, to a dentist licensed under chapter 466, to a 3750 hospital licensed under chapter 395, to a crisis stabilization 3751 unit licensed under part IV of chapter 394, to a health 3752 maintenance organization certificated under part I of chapter 3753 641, to clinics included in chapter 390, or to an ambulatory 3754 surgical center as defined in s. 396.202 s. 395.002, and each 3755 insurer providing professional liability insurance to a member 3756 of The Florida Bar shall report to the office as set forth in 3757 paragraph (c) any written claim or action for damages for 3758 personal injuries claimed to have been caused by error, 3759 omission, or negligence in the performance of such insuredâs 3760 professional services or based on a claimed performance of 3761 professional services without consent. 3762 Section 101.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 3763 641.31076, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3764 641.31076âShared savings incentive program.â 3765 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 3766 (a)ââHealth care providerâ means a hospital or facility 3767 licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396; an entity licensed 3768 under chapter 400; a health care practitioner as defined in s. 3769 456.001; a blood bank, plasma center, industrial clinic, or 3770 renal dialysis facility; or a professional association, 3771 partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other association 3772 for professional activity by health care providers. The term 3773 includes entities and professionals outside this state with an 3774 active, unencumbered license for an equivalent facility or 3775 practitioner type issued by another state, the District of 3776 Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States. 3777 Section 102.âSubsection (2) of section 765.101, Florida 3778 Statutes, is amended to read: 3779 765.101âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 3780 (2)ââAttending physicianâ means the physician who has 3781 primary responsibility for the treatment and care of the patient 3782 while the patient receives such treatment or care in a hospital 3783 as defined in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(12). 3784 Section 103.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 3785 766.101, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3786 766.101âMedical review committee, immunity from liability.â 3787 (1)âAs used in this section: 3788 (a)âThe term âmedical review committeeâ or âcommitteeâ 3789 means: 3790 1.a.âA committee of a hospital licensed under chapter 395 3791 or an ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 395 3792 or a health maintenance organization certificated under part I 3793 of chapter 641; 3794 b.âA committee of a physician-hospital organization, a 3795 provider-sponsored organization, or an integrated delivery 3796 system; 3797 c.âA committee of a state or local professional society of 3798 health care providers; 3799 d.âA committee of a medical staff of a licensed hospital or 3800 nursing home, provided the medical staff operates pursuant to 3801 written bylaws that have been approved by the governing board of 3802 the hospital or nursing home; 3803 e.âA committee of the Department of Corrections or the 3804 Correctional Medical Authority as created under s. 945.602, or 3805 employees, agents, or consultants of either the department or 3806 the authority or both; 3807 f.âA committee of a professional service corporation formed 3808 under chapter 621 or a corporation organized under part I of 3809 chapter 607 or chapter 617, which is formed and operated for the 3810 practice of medicine as defined in s. 458.305(3), and which has 3811 at least 25 health care providers who routinely provide health 3812 care services directly to patients; 3813 g.âA committee of the Department of Children and Families 3814 which includes employees, agents, or consultants to the 3815 department as deemed necessary to provide peer review, 3816 utilization review, and mortality review of treatment services 3817 provided pursuant to chapters 394, 397, and 916; 3818 h.âA committee of a mental health treatment facility 3819 licensed under chapter 394 or a community mental health center 3820 as defined in s. 394.907, provided the quality assurance program 3821 operates pursuant to the guidelines that have been approved by 3822 the governing board of the agency; 3823 i.âA committee of a substance abuse treatment and education 3824 prevention program licensed under chapter 397 provided the 3825 quality assurance program operates pursuant to the guidelines 3826 that have been approved by the governing board of the agency; 3827 j.âA peer review or utilization review committee organized 3828 under chapter 440; 3829 k.âA committee of the Department of Health, a county health 3830 department, healthy start coalition, or certified rural health 3831 network, when reviewing quality of care, or employees of these 3832 entities when reviewing mortality records; or 3833 l.âA continuous quality improvement committee of a pharmacy 3834 licensed pursuant to chapter 465, 3835 3836 which committee is formed to evaluate and improve the quality of 3837 health care rendered by providers of health service, to 3838 determine that health services rendered were professionally 3839 indicated or were performed in compliance with the applicable 3840 standard of care, or that the cost of health care rendered was 3841 considered reasonable by the providers of professional health 3842 services in the area; or 3843 2.âA committee of an insurer, self-insurer, or joint 3844 underwriting association of medical malpractice insurance, or 3845 other persons conducting review under s. 766.106. 3846 Section 104.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 3847 (4) of section 766.1016, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3848 766.1016âPatient safety data privilege.â 3849 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 3850 (a)ââPatient safety dataâ means reports made to patient 3851 safety organizations, including all health care data, 3852 interviews, memoranda, analyses, root cause analyses, products 3853 of quality assurance or quality improvement processes, 3854 corrective action plans, or information collected or created by 3855 a health care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 3856 396, or a health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001(4), 3857 as a result of an occurrence related to the provision of health 3858 care services which exacerbates an existing medical condition or 3859 could result in injury, illness, or death. 3860 (4)âThe exchange of patient safety data among health care 3861 facilities licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396, or health 3862 care practitioners as defined in s. 456.001(4), or patient 3863 safety organizations which does not identify any patient shall 3864 not constitute a waiver of any privilege established in this 3865 section. 3866 Section 105.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 3867 766.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3868 766.106âNotice before filing action for medical negligence; 3869 presuit screening period; offers for admission of liability and 3870 for arbitration; informal discovery; review.â 3871 (2)âPRESUIT NOTICE.â 3872 (d)âFollowing the initiation of a suit alleging medical 3873 negligence with a court of competent jurisdiction, and service 3874 of the complaint upon a prospective defendant, the claimant 3875 shall provide a copy of the complaint to the Department of 3876 Health and, if the complaint involves a facility licensed under 3877 chapter 395, the Agency for Health Care Administration. The 3878 requirement of providing the complaint to the Department of 3879 Health or the Agency for Health Care Administration does not 3880 impair the claimantâs legal rights or ability to seek relief for 3881 his or her claim. The Department of Health or the Agency for 3882 Health Care Administration shall review each incident that is 3883 the subject of the complaint and determine whether it involved 3884 conduct by a licensee which is potentially subject to 3885 disciplinary action, in which case, for a licensed health care 3886 practitioner, s. 456.073 applies and, for a licensed facility, 3887 part I of chapter 395 applies, and for a licensed ambulatory 3888 surgical center, chapter 396 applies. 3889 Section 106.âSubsection (3) of section 766.110, Florida 3890 Statutes, is amended to read: 3891 766.110âLiability of health care facilities.â 3892 (3)âIn order to ensure comprehensive risk management for 3893 diagnosis of disease, a health care facility, including a 3894 hospital as defined in s. 395.002 or an ambulatory surgical 3895 center, as defined in s. 396.202 chapter 395, may use scientific 3896 diagnostic disease methodologies that use information regarding 3897 specific diseases in health care facilities and that are adopted 3898 by the facilityâs medical review committee. 3899 Section 107.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 3900 766.1115, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3901 766.1115âHealth care providers; creation of agency 3902 relationship with governmental contractors.â 3903 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 3904 (d)ââHealth care providerâ or âproviderâ means: 3905 1.âA birth center licensed under chapter 383. 3906 2.âAn ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 3907 395. 3908 3.âA hospital licensed under chapter 395. 3909 4.âA physician or physician assistant licensed under 3910 chapter 458. 3911 5.âAn osteopathic physician or osteopathic physician 3912 assistant licensed under chapter 459. 3913 6.âA chiropractic physician licensed under chapter 460. 3914 7.âA podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461. 3915 8.âA registered nurse, nurse midwife, licensed practical 3916 nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed or 3917 registered under part I of chapter 464 or any facility which 3918 employs nurses licensed or registered under part I of chapter 3919 464 to supply all or part of the care delivered under this 3920 section. 3921 9.âA midwife licensed under chapter 467. 3922 10.âA health maintenance organization certificated under 3923 part I of chapter 641. 3924 11.âA health care professional association and its 3925 employees or a corporate medical group and its employees. 3926 12.âAny other medical facility the primary purpose of which 3927 is to deliver human medical diagnostic services or which 3928 delivers nonsurgical human medical treatment, and which includes 3929 an office maintained by a provider. 3930 13.âA dentist or dental hygienist licensed under chapter 3931 466. 3932 14.âA free clinic that delivers only medical diagnostic 3933 services or nonsurgical medical treatment free of charge to all 3934 low-income recipients. 3935 15.âAny other health care professional, practitioner, 3936 provider, or facility under contract with a governmental 3937 contractor, including a student enrolled in an accredited 3938 program that prepares the student for licensure as any one of 3939 the professionals listed in subparagraphs 4.-9. 3940 3941 The term includes any nonprofit corporation qualified as exempt 3942 from federal income taxation under s. 501(a) of the Internal 3943 Revenue Code, and described in s. 501(c) of the Internal Revenue 3944 Code, which delivers health care services provided by licensed 3945 professionals listed in this paragraph, any federally funded 3946 community health center, and any volunteer corporation or 3947 volunteer health care provider that delivers health care 3948 services. 3949 Section 108.âSubsection (4) and paragraph (b) of subsection 3950 (6) of section 766.118, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3951 766.118âDetermination of noneconomic damages.â 3952 (4)âLIMITATION ON NONECONOMIC DAMAGES FOR NEGLIGENCE OF 3953 PRACTITIONERS PROVIDING EMERGENCY SERVICES AND CARE. 3954 Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3), with respect to a cause 3955 of action for personal injury or wrongful death arising from 3956 medical negligence of practitioners providing emergency services 3957 and care, as defined in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(9), or providing 3958 services as provided in s. 401.265, or providing services 3959 pursuant to obligations imposed by 42 U.S.C. s. 1395dd to 3960 persons with whom the practitioner does not have a then-existing 3961 health care patient-practitioner relationship for that medical 3962 condition: 3963 (a)âRegardless of the number of such practitioner 3964 defendants, noneconomic damages may shall not exceed $150,000 3965 per claimant. 3966 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), the total noneconomic 3967 damages recoverable by all claimants from all such practitioners 3968 may shall not exceed $300,000. 3969 3970 The limitation provided by this subsection applies only to 3971 noneconomic damages awarded as a result of any act or omission 3972 of providing medical care or treatment, including diagnosis that 3973 occurs prior to the time the patient is stabilized and is 3974 capable of receiving medical treatment as a nonemergency 3975 patient, unless surgery is required as a result of the emergency 3976 within a reasonable time after the patient is stabilized, in 3977 which case the limitation provided by this subsection applies to 3978 any act or omission of providing medical care or treatment which 3979 occurs prior to the stabilization of the patient following the 3980 surgery. 3981 (6)âLIMITATION ON NONECONOMIC DAMAGES FOR NEGLIGENCE OF A 3982 PRACTITIONER PROVIDING SERVICES AND CARE TO A MEDICAID 3983 RECIPIENT.âNotwithstanding subsections (2), (3), and (5), with 3984 respect to a cause of action for personal injury or wrongful 3985 death arising from medical negligence of a practitioner 3986 committed in the course of providing medical services and 3987 medical care to a Medicaid recipient, regardless of the number 3988 of such practitioner defendants providing the services and care, 3989 noneconomic damages may not exceed $300,000 per claimant, unless 3990 the claimant pleads and proves, by clear and convincing 3991 evidence, that the practitioner acted in a wrongful manner. A 3992 practitioner providing medical services and medical care to a 3993 Medicaid recipient is not liable for more than $200,000 in 3994 noneconomic damages, regardless of the number of claimants, 3995 unless the claimant pleads and proves, by clear and convincing 3996 evidence, that the practitioner acted in a wrongful manner. The 3997 fact that a claimant proves that a practitioner acted in a 3998 wrongful manner does not preclude the application of the 3999 limitation on noneconomic damages prescribed elsewhere in this 4000 section. For purposes of this subsection: 4001 (b)âThe term âpractitioner,â in addition to the meaning 4002 prescribed in subsection (1), includes a any hospital or 4003 ambulatory surgical center as defined and licensed under chapter 4004 395 or an ambulatory surgical center as defined and licensed 4005 under chapter 396. 4006 Section 109.âSubsection (4) of section 766.202, Florida 4007 Statutes, is amended to read: 4008 766.202âDefinitions; ss. 766.201-766.212.âAs used in ss. 4009 766.201-766.212, the term: 4010 (4)ââHealth care providerâ means a any hospital or 4011 ambulatory surgical center as defined and licensed under chapter 4012 395; an ambulatory surgical center as defined and licensed under 4013 chapter 396; a birth center licensed under chapter 383; any 4014 person licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, 4015 chapter 461, chapter 462, chapter 463, part I of chapter 464, 4016 chapter 466, chapter 467, part XIV of chapter 468, or chapter 4017 486; a health maintenance organization certificated under part I 4018 of chapter 641; a blood bank; a plasma center; an industrial 4019 clinic; a renal dialysis facility; or a professional association 4020 partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other association 4021 for professional activity by health care providers. 4022 Section 110.âSection 766.316, Florida Statutes, is amended 4023 to read: 4024 766.316âNotice to obstetrical patients of participation in 4025 the plan.âEach hospital with a participating physician on its 4026 staff and each participating physician, other than residents, 4027 assistant residents, and interns deemed to be participating 4028 physicians under s. 766.314(4)(c), under the Florida Birth 4029 Related Neurological Injury Compensation Plan shall provide 4030 notice to the obstetrical patients as to the limited no-fault 4031 alternative for birth-related neurological injuries. Such notice 4032 shall be provided on forms furnished by the association and 4033 shall include a clear and concise explanation of a patientâs 4034 rights and limitations under the plan. The hospital or the 4035 participating physician may elect to have the patient sign a 4036 form acknowledging receipt of the notice form. Signature of the 4037 patient acknowledging receipt of the notice form raises a 4038 rebuttable presumption that the notice requirements of this 4039 section have been met. Notice need not be given to a patient 4040 when the patient has an emergency medical condition as defined 4041 in s. 395.002 s. 395.002(8)(b) or when notice is not 4042 practicable. 4043 Section 111.âSubsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (8) of 4044 section 790.338, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 4045 790.338âMedical privacy concerning firearms; prohibitions; 4046 penalties; exceptions.â 4047 (1)âA health care practitioner licensed under chapter 456 4048 or a health care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 4049 396 may not intentionally enter any disclosed information 4050 concerning firearm ownership into the patientâs medical record 4051 if the practitioner knows that such information is not relevant 4052 to the patientâs medical care or safety, or the safety of 4053 others. 4054 (2)âA health care practitioner licensed under chapter 456 4055 or a health care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 4056 396 shall respect a patientâs right to privacy and should 4057 refrain from making a written inquiry or asking questions 4058 concerning the ownership of a firearm or ammunition by the 4059 patient or by a family member of the patient, or the presence of 4060 a firearm in a private home or other domicile of the patient or 4061 a family member of the patient. Notwithstanding this provision, 4062 a health care practitioner or health care facility that in good 4063 faith believes that this information is relevant to the 4064 patientâs medical care or safety, or the safety of others, may 4065 make such a verbal or written inquiry. 4066 (5)âA health care practitioner licensed under chapter 456 4067 or a health care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 4068 396 may not discriminate against a patient based solely upon the 4069 patientâs exercise of the constitutional right to own and 4070 possess firearms or ammunition. 4071 (6)âA health care practitioner licensed under chapter 456 4072 or a health care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 4073 396 shall respect a patientâs legal right to own or possess a 4074 firearm and should refrain from unnecessarily harassing a 4075 patient about firearm ownership during an examination. 4076 (8)âViolations of the provisions of subsections (1)-(4) 4077 constitute grounds for disciplinary action under ss. 456.072(2), 4078 and 395.1055, and 396.218, as applicable. 4079 Section 112.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 4080 812.014, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4081 812.014âTheft.â 4082 (2) 4083 (b)1.âIf the property stolen is valued at $20,000 or more, 4084 but less than $100,000; 4085 2.âIf the property stolen is cargo valued at less than 4086 $50,000 that has entered the stream of interstate or intrastate 4087 commerce from the shipperâs loading platform to the consigneeâs 4088 receiving dock; 4089 3.âIf the property stolen is emergency medical equipment, 4090 valued at $300 or more, that is taken from a facility licensed 4091 under chapter 395 or from an aircraft or vehicle permitted under 4092 chapter 401; or 4093 4.âIf the property stolen is law enforcement equipment, 4094 valued at $300 or more, that is taken from an authorized 4095 emergency vehicle, as defined in s. 316.003, 4096 4097 the offender commits grand theft in the second degree, 4098 punishable as a felony of the second degree, as provided in s. 4099 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. Emergency medical equipment 4100 means mechanical or electronic apparatus used to provide 4101 emergency services and care as defined in s. 395.002 s. 4102 395.002(9) or to treat medical emergencies. Law enforcement 4103 equipment means any property, device, or apparatus used by any 4104 law enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10 in the officerâs 4105 official business. However, if the property is stolen during a 4106 riot or an aggravated riot prohibited under s. 870.01 and the 4107 perpetration of the theft is facilitated by conditions arising 4108 from the riot; or within a county that is subject to a state of 4109 emergency declared by the Governor under chapter 252, the theft 4110 is committed after the declaration of emergency is made, and the 4111 perpetration of the theft is facilitated by conditions arising 4112 from the emergency, the theft is a felony of the first degree, 4113 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 4114 As used in this paragraph, the term âconditions arising from the 4115 riotâ means civil unrest, power outages, curfews, or a reduction 4116 in the presence of or response time for first responders or 4117 homeland security personnel and the term âconditions arising 4118 from the emergencyâ means civil unrest, power outages, curfews, 4119 voluntary or mandatory evacuations, or a reduction in the 4120 presence of or response time for first responders or homeland 4121 security personnel. A person arrested for committing a theft 4122 during a riot or an aggravated riot or within a county that is 4123 subject to a state of emergency may not be released until the 4124 person appears before a committing magistrate at a first 4125 appearance hearing. For purposes of sentencing under chapter 4126 921, a felony offense that is reclassified under this paragraph 4127 is ranked one level above the ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 4128 921.0023 of the offense committed. 4129 Section 113.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 4130 893.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4131 893.05âPractitioners and persons administering controlled 4132 substances in their absence.â 4133 (1) 4134 (b)âPursuant to s. 458.347(4)(g), s. 459.022(4)(f), or s. 4135 464.012(3), as applicable, a practitioner who supervises a 4136 licensed physician assistant or advanced practice registered 4137 nurse may authorize the licensed physician assistant or advanced 4138 practice registered nurse to order controlled substances for 4139 administration to a patient in a facility licensed under chapter 4140 395, chapter 396, or part II of chapter 400. 4141 Section 114.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 4142 893.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4143 893.13âProhibited acts; penalties.â 4144 (1) 4145 (h)âExcept as authorized by this chapter, a person may not 4146 sell, manufacture, or deliver, or possess with intent to sell, 4147 manufacture, or deliver, a controlled substance in, on, or 4148 within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising a mental 4149 health facility, as that term is used in chapter 394; a health 4150 care facility licensed under chapter 395 or chapter 396 which 4151 provides substance abuse treatment; a licensed service provider 4152 as defined in s. 397.311; a facility providing services that 4153 include clinical treatment, intervention, or prevention as 4154 described in s. 397.311(27); a recovery residence as defined in 4155 s. 397.311; an assisted living facility as defined in chapter 4156 429; or a pain management clinic as defined in s. 4157 458.3265(1)(a)1.c. or s. 459.0137(1)(a)1.c. A person who 4158 violates this paragraph with respect to: 4159 1.âA controlled substance named or described in s. 4160 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. 4161 commits a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 4162 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 4163 2.âA controlled substance named or described in s. 4164 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., 4165 (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) commits a felony of 4166 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 4167 775.083, or s. 775.084. 4168 3.âAny other controlled substance, except as lawfully sold, 4169 manufactured, or delivered, must be sentenced to pay a $500 fine 4170 and to serve 100 hours of public service in addition to any 4171 other penalty prescribed by law. 4172 Section 115.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 4173 945.6041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4174 945.6041âInmate medical services.â 4175 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 4176 (b)ââHealth care providerâ means: 4177 1.âA hospital licensed under chapter 395. 4178 2.âA physician or physician assistant licensed under 4179 chapter 458. 4180 3.âAn osteopathic physician or physician assistant licensed 4181 under chapter 459. 4182 4.âA podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461. 4183 5.âA health maintenance organization certificated under 4184 part I of chapter 641. 4185 6.âAn ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 4186 395. 4187 7.âA professional association, partnership, corporation, 4188 joint venture, or other association established by the 4189 individuals set forth in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. for 4190 professional activity. 4191 8.âAn other medical facility. 4192 a.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âother medical 4193 facilityâ means: 4194 (I)âA facility the primary purpose of which is to provide 4195 human medical diagnostic services, or a facility providing 4196 nonsurgical human medical treatment which discharges patients on 4197 the same working day that the patients are admitted; and 4198 (II)âA facility that is not part of a hospital. 4199 b.âThe term does not include a facility existing for the 4200 primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy, or an 4201 office maintained by a physician or dentist for the practice of 4202 medicine. 4203 Section 116.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 4204 985.6441, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4205 985.6441âHealth care services.â 4206 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 4207 (a)ââHealth care providerâ means: 4208 1.âA hospital licensed under chapter 395. 4209 2.âA physician or physician assistant licensed under 4210 chapter 458. 4211 3.âAn osteopathic physician or physician assistant licensed 4212 under chapter 459. 4213 4.âA podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461. 4214 5.âA health maintenance organization certificated under 4215 part I of chapter 641. 4216 6.âAn ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 396 4217 395. 4218 7.âA professional association, partnership, corporation, 4219 joint venture, or other association established by the 4220 individuals set forth in subparagraphs 2.-4. for professional 4221 activity. 4222 8.âAn other medical facility. 4223 a.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âother medical 4224 facilityâ means: 4225 (I)âA facility the primary purpose of which is to provide 4226 human medical diagnostic services, or a facility providing 4227 nonsurgical human medical treatment which discharges patients on 4228 the same working day that the patients are admitted; and 4229 (II)âA facility that is not part of a hospital. 4230 b.âThe term does not include a facility existing for the 4231 primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy, or an 4232 office maintained by a physician or dentist for the practice of 4233 medicine. 4234 Section 117.âParagraph (b) of subsection (28) of section 4235 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4236 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 4237 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 4238 powers and perform all duties listed below: 4239 (28)âUNACCOMPANIED HOMELESS YOUTH.âProvide to each student 4240 who is an unaccompanied homeless youth certified under s. 4241 743.067 a card that includes information on the rights and 4242 benefits for such youth, as well as the contact information for 4243 the school districtâs liaison for homeless children and youths. 4244 The card must be similar in size to the student identification 4245 card issued to students in the district and include all of the 4246 following information: 4247 (b)âOn the back of the card, the following statement: 4248 4249 Section 743.067, Florida Statutes, provides that this 4250 certified youth may consent to medical care; dental 4251 care; behavioral health care services, including 4252 psychological counseling and treatment, psychiatric 4253 treatment, and substance abuse prevention and 4254 treatment services; and surgical diagnosis and 4255 treatment, including preventative care and care by a 4256 facility licensed under chapter 394, chapter 395, 4257 chapter 396, or chapter 397 and any forensic medical 4258 examination for the purpose of investigating any 4259 felony offense under chapter 784, chapter 787, chapter 4260 794, chapter 800, or chapter 827, for himself or 4261 herself or his or her child, if the certified youth is 4262 unmarried, is the parent of the child, and has actual 4263 custody of the child. 4264 Section 118.âSubsection (1) of section 1012.965, Florida 4265 Statutes, is amended to read: 4266 1012.965âPayment of costs of civil action against 4267 employees.â 4268 (1)âAn employee or agent under the right of control of a 4269 university board of trustees who, pursuant to the university 4270 boardâs policies or rules, renders medical care or treatment at 4271 any hospital or health care facility with which the university 4272 board maintains an affiliation agreement whereby the hospital or 4273 health care facility provides to the university board a clinical 4274 setting for health care education, research, and services, is 4275 shall not be deemed to be an agent of any person other than the 4276 university board in any civil action resulting from any act or 4277 omission of the employee or agent while rendering said medical 4278 care or treatment. For this subsection to apply, the patient 4279 shall be provided separate written conspicuous notice by the 4280 university board of trustees or by the hospital or health care 4281 facility, and shall acknowledge receipt of this notice, in 4282 writing, unless impractical by reason of an emergency, either 4283 personally or through another person authorized to give consent 4284 for him or her, that he or she will receive care provided by 4285 university boardâs employees and liability, if any, that may 4286 arise from that care is limited as provided by law. Compliance 4287 by a hospital or health care facility with the requirements of 4288 chapter 395, chapter 396, or s. 766.110(1) may shall not be used 4289 as evidence in any civil action to establish an employment or 4290 agency relationship between the hospital or health care facility 4291 and an employee or agent of the university board of trustees 4292 providing services within the hospital or health care facility. 4293 Section 119.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026. 4294 4295